Open Employment Contract
------------------------

This is a project to make a shared employment contract. We are in the early stages. Please contact us if you want to help. Employment lawyers particularly welcome.FortMinor

95f5f8f

Trade The following is a list of online and real world businesses that currently accept Bitcoin. If you are looking for only real world commerce, see here

New service providers are very much appreciated as they help establish the currency! Please only list services that are presently available (that is, NOT "available soon") and accepting bitcoins.

Note: it still remains up to you to decide whether you trust the service provider or not.

Products or services illegal in US or Japan are not fit to be listed here - such links will be removed immediately. Any attempt to get those links up again will result in the account being blocked. This includes pornography and many mind-altering drugs. Read this to learn where you can submit your site without censorship or removal (directory URLs are near the bottom of the above link's page).

Contents [hide] 1 Getting started 1.1 Free Samples and Offers 2 Currency exchanges 2.1 Real-time Trading 2.2 Fixed rate 2.3 Bulk/Large-sized Trades 2.4 Gift/Debit Cards 2.5 Precious & Base Metals/Coins 2.6 Anonymous Exchanges 2.7 Local/In-Hand Exchanges 3 Financial 3.1 Contracts 3.2 Equities 3.3 Forex 3.4 Futures 3.5 Lending 3.6 Options 3.7 Tools 4 Bitcoin eWallets 4.1 Bitcoin Banking and Ewallets 5 Bitcoin payment systems 5.1 Escrow 6 Internet & Mobile services 6.1 Bitcoin-related 6.2 Connectivity 6.3 Design 6.3.1 Creative 6.3.2 Web 6.3.3 Art 6.4 Web Hosting 6.5 Dedicated/Virtual Server Hosting 6.6 Domain Name and DNS Hosting 6.7 Email 6.8 VoIP/SMS 6.9 Security Services 6.10 Mobile App Development 6.11 Productivity 6.12 Other 7 Online products 7.1 Search Engines 7.2 Cloud Providers and Services 7.3 Software 7.4 Education-related Software 7.5 Gambling 7.6 Games 7.7 Graphic design 7.8 File sharing 7.9 Music 7.10 Virtual Art 7.11 Digital Downloads 7.12 Entertainment/Books/Magazines 7.13 Social Media/Aggregators 7.14 Cyber Begging 7.15 Internet Marketing 7.16 Mobile Phone Refill Codes 8 Material / Physical Products 8.1 Purchasing Services 8.2 Liquor/Wines 8.3 Automobiles 8.4 Alternative Energy 8.5 Outdoors 8.6 Superstores 8.7 Games - Physical 8.8 Classified 8.9 Jewelry 8.10 Marketplaces 8.11 Auction sites 8.12 Toys, Games and Hobbies 8.13 Clothing and accessories 8.14 Home 8.15 Electronics 8.16 Consumables 8.17 Books 8.18 Music 8.19 Film/Movies 8.20 Art and Artwork 8.20.1 Collage / Mixed Media 8.20.2 Comics 8.20.3 Paintings 8.20.4 Photography 8.20.5 Printmaking 8.20.6 PostCards 8.21 Art Production 8.21.1 Musical Instruments 8.21.2 Pro Audio Equipment 8.22 Gift articles 8.23 Craftsmanship 8.24 Craftwork 8.25 Collectables 8.26 Car Accessories 8.27 Bitcoin promotional articles 8.28 Game accessories 8.29 Beauty products 8.30 Precision mechanics 8.31 Printing 8.32 Children 8.33 Manufacturing 8.34 Flags 8.35 Health and Fitness 8.35.1 Online Pharmacy 8.36 Scientific Supplies 8.37 Other 8.38 Promotional Products 9 Professional services 9.1 Language services (teaching, coaching, translation etc.) 9.2 Health Care 9.2.1 Physicians 9.2.2 Chiropractors 9.2.3 Dentists & Dental Services 9.2.4 Kinesiologia 9.3 Creative services 9.4 Consulting 9.5 Job Boards 9.6 Legal Services 9.7 Local Massage 9.8 Psychotherapy / Counseling 9.9 Insurance 9.10 Repair and Maintenance Services 9.11 Software - Professional services 9.12 Technical support 9.13 Web Development 9.14 Architecture and Engineering Services 9.15 Other - Professional services 10 Commerce and community 10.1 Charity 10.2 Web Communities 10.3 Financial Services 10.4 Information services 10.4.1 Directories 10.5 Advertising 10.6 Political Activism 10.7 Local Goods/Services 11 Travel / Tourism / Leisure 11.1 Transportation / Tickets 11.2 Events 11.3 Restaurants and cafes 11.3.1 North America 11.3.2 Europe 11.3.2.1 Austria 11.3.2.2 Belgium 11.3.2.3 France 11.3.2.4 Germany 11.3.2.5 Greece 11.3.2.6 The Netherlands 11.3.2.7 Switzerland 11.3.2.8 United Kingdom 11.3.3 Restaurant Directories 11.4 Bed and Breakfast 11.5 Hostels 11.6 Hotels 11.7 Other Accommodations 11.7.1 Middle East 11.7.2 South America 11.7.3 International 11.7.4 Houses & Apartments 11.8 Travel Companies 11.9 Sports 11.10 Tour guides 12 See Also Getting started Free Samples and Offers dailybitcoins, gives away Bitcoins absolutely for free every hour. Free Digital Money (info), simple and fast way to earn a larger amount of free Bitcoins through sponsored offers. Bitvegas (info) Casino style Minecraft server that gives out .0005 free Bitcoins for every fifteen minutes spent on the server. BitCrate Break a crate and get free bitcoins. [Sponsored through ads] CoinAd More "free" bitcoins Bitcoiner Pays out random amount every day. Also contains a list of similar sites. Bunny Run (info), Try to pick the fastest bunny (but you get payed even if your bunny finishes last). BitVisitor pays for visiting sponsored sites. EarnFreeBitcoins visit sponsored websites and receive bitcoins Coinreaper (info), Coinreaper collects the best links to get free Bitcoins. It presents these sites sequentially, you just have to click 'Next'. BahtCoin.com Gives free Bitcoins to test (for Thailand residents only). Update: Extended to Laos, Cambodia, Vietnam, Myanmar, Bangladesh, Malaysia. bithits daily free bitcoins thefreebitcoins another free bitcoins site, requires captcha canhasbitcoins faucetBTC elbitcoingratis.es BTC4you freebtc4all virtual faucet freebitcoins.me BitcoinGet (info), Get free bitcoins by watching videos, doing simple tasks, and more. free.btc.pt free bitcoins for watching YouTube videos or filling out surveys BitBucks Earn bitcoins by completing promotional offers, e.g. surveys, trials, sweepstakes, etc. Payouts are in the range $1 - $20. abitback offer site. btc4free cointube video site CashClamber, Get an anonymous avatar, friend our user 'banshee' and we will donate you some bitcoin to start social gaming, head to head, against other users. There's a daily limit but give it try. CryptocoinFountains, a list of sites that provide free bitcoin. PikaPay's Bitcoin Fountain Pays out instantly unlimited times per day so that you can send in seconds to any established account on Twitter. FREE Bitcoin play you can always use free bitcoins. EveryTabs pays in bitcoins for coded iPad forms. [1] Pays automatically every day regardless of usage. Currency exchanges Real-time Trading In these systems, users place buys and sells themselves on the exchange and the price is set by a market. The exchange usually acts as a mutual platform between the two parties, holds the funds, executes the trade, then releases funds as requested.

The exchange may take a percent or charge a fee on trades/withdrawals/deposits.

Client USD EUR GBP CHF RUB JPY AUD PLN ILS INR CAD BRL COP NZD SEK DKK TBH HKD SGD CNY Holds BTC Holds Other Other Minilogo.png 1Bse (info) Yes Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Supports: USD (Payeer, Bank Transfer), EUR (Payeer, Bank Transfer), HKD (Bank Transfer), SGD (Bank Transfer), CNY (Bank Transfer). Bitcoin, Litecoin, Dogecoin for deposits & witdrawals. Fee for transactions - 0.15%. Language: English. Exchange Based in Hong Kong BitBargain (info) No No Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes No Instant UK Bank Transfer, Pingit, Ukash accepted Money goes to seller directly Bitcoin-24 No Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes Yes SEPA, Bank wire, instant SOFORT Überweisung deposit within the EU, instant Credit Card deposit Bitcoin-Central (info) Yes Yes Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes Yes EUR SEPA wires, Supports Pecunix Gold bitcoin.de (info) No Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes No SEPA, Bank wire, Moneybookers, Person to Person BitSource (info) Yes Yes Yes Funding No No No No Yes Funding No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes Yes USD (Bank wire transfer, instant credit card deposit, Bank wire deposit) Bittylicious (info) No Yes Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes Yes Instant UK bank transfer or SEPA payments Money goes to seller directly BTC.sx (info) Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No A leveraged trading platform allowing Long and Short positions to be opened in Bitcoin. No fiat money transfers are required. Bitcoin Fund US (info) Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes No US Bank Transfer. Hedge Fund investing in Bitcoin. Qualified Purchasers only. For now only phone trading available. Account from 100 000 USD. 1 Fund Share = 1 BTC bitNZ (info) No No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes No No No No No No Yes Yes Cash deposit at Westpac. Withdrawal to your New Zealand bank only. Bitstamp (info) Yes Yes Funding Yes Funding Yes Funding No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes Yes EUR funding via SEPA bank transfer BTCMarkets (info) No No No No No No Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes Yes Australia's full service Bitcoin exchange. AUD domestic bank transfers and cash deposits at any Westpac branch in Australia. No deposit or withdrawal fees. https://btcmarkets.net BTC-E (info) Yes No No No Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes Yes Cash deposit (USD) at banks, cash withdraw (RUR) into accounts. WebMoney, Interkassa, OKPay, LiqPay, Perfect Money, QIWI, Yandex are just some of deposit and withdrawal methods. Language: English, Russian. Camp BX (info) Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes Yes Supports: USD (Dwolla), USD (P2P bank transfer at Chase, B of A, Wells Fargo and ING), USD (Personal Check deposit), USD (ACH) for withdrawal, USD (USPS Postal money order), USD (Canada Post money order for deposit), USD (Domestic bank wire withdrawal), USD (International bank wire withdrawal). [ E-cointrade.com logo.png ] e-CoinTrade (info) Yes Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes Yes Supports: USD (Perfect Money), EUR (Perfect Money). Bitcoin and other altcoins for deposits & witdrawals EXANTE Bitcoin Fund (info) Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes SEPA transfer, international bank transfer. Bitcoin Hedge Fund with real-time trading support. Account from 100 000 USD. 1 Fund Share = 1 BTC itBit (info) Yes Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes No Yes Yes SGD (Bank Wire / GIRO), USD (Bank Wire), EUR (Bank Wire) FYB-SG (info) No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes No Yes Yes SGD (Online bank transfer/Cash Deposit at any UOB ATM) FYB-SE (info) No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes No No No No No Yes Yes SEK (Online bank transfer) Intersango (formerly britcoin) (info) No Yes No No No No No Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes Yes GBP (bank transfer), EUR (SEPA bank wire), and PLN (Bank Wire) Kapiton.se (info) No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes No No No No No Yes Yes SEK (bankgiro bank transfer) LocalBitcoins.com (info) Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes No Cash trade, SEPA transfer, bank wire transfer, OKPay, Dwolla, PayPal, cash deposit, Western Union, Moneybookers MoneypakTrader.com (info) Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes Yes Moneypak (USD) <==> BTC <==> ReLoadit, etc. OTC Exchange (info) Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No PayPal <-> Bitcoin operations. No funds deposit/withdrawal. Funds go directly from buyer to seller. ScifiCoin Exchange (info) No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Science fiction and fantasy related exchange incorporated in USA. Trade Bitcoin for Gold Pressed Latium. The Rock Currency Exchange (info) Yes Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes Yes Started with Linden Dollars. Bank wire and Dwolla accepted. Vircurex (info) Yes Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes Yes Funding of accounts via Aurumxchange, offering SEPA, Perfect Money, Pecunix, Cosmic Pay, eGold and many more. Exchanges between at least 17 cryptocurrencies. VirtEx (info) No No No No No No No No No No Yes No No No No No No No No No Yes Yes Cash deposit at Bank of Montreal or ScotiaBank. Online bill payment deposit. Wire transfer. Withdraw as direct deposit, postal draft (by mail), or Payza (formerly AlertPay) VirWoX (info) Yes Indirectly Yes Indirectly Yes Indirectly Yes Indirectly No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes Yes Currently only allows to buy or sell Bitcoins for Linden Dollars, which are in turn convertible to or from EUR, USD, GBP, and CHF. Fund with PayPal, Ukash, MoneyBookers/Skrill, NeTELLER and more. WeExchange.co (info) Yes No No No No No Yes No No No Yes No No No No No No No No No Yes Yes Fund with CAD via Interac E-Transfer. Fund with AUD via bank transfer. SnapSwap No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes Yes Trades IMVU credits (game currency) for bitcoins xCFD (info) Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Real-Time leveraged (1:5) trading with short and long positions. Accepts Credit Cards, Skrill, Wire Transfers, Webmoney as deposit/withdrawal methods Coinnext No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Bitcoin exchange focused on alternative cryptocurrencies Rapid CX No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes Yes Bitcoin to alternative cryptocurrencies exchange. Cryptocurrencies only, no fiat. Fixed rate A vendor sets a fixed price which people can buy and sell at. The prices may have a spread as a fee for the exchange operator.

Service USD EUR GBP CHF RUB JPY AUD PLN CZK RON ILS CAD LVL LTL SEK NOK DKK HRK BGN NZD INR BHD AED HKD ISK JOD KES KWD MAD MXN PKR PHP SAR SGD LKR ZAR KRW TWD THB TND TRY HUF Other BIPS.gif BIPS Market (info) Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Bank transfer to and from any listed country, also support other payment processors for payout. Favicon b4c.jpg bit4coin.net (info) No Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Buy bitcoin gift vouchers online with EUR (SEPA or international transfer). Redeem vouchers for bitcoin at bit4coin.net Bitcoin (Australia) No No No No No No Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No AUD (Cash deposit at local bank branch) BitServiceX (info) No Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No European Bitcoin Exchange. Buy Bitcoin with iDEAL, Sofortüberweisung, Giropay and Bancontact / MisterCash. BitSimpleIcon.png BitSimple. (info) Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Direct broker of bitcoins. Does not hold user funds. Purchases coins directly from any wallet with instant rate locks. Same day payouts on bitcoin purchases. BXlogoSM.jpeg bitXoin (info) No No No No No No Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Buy Bitcoins in Australia. Cash deposits accepted at bank branchs in 87% of Australian cities and towns (limited 5% commission for BitCoin.IT users! promo-code: YES5!). Lilion Transfer (info) Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes No Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Bank wire SWIFT/SEPA (over 200 bank accounts in 9 countries in 20 currencies). FIAT: BTC, EUR, GBP, CHF, USD, CAD, AUD, PLN, CZK, RUB, RON, BGN, HRK, DKK, SEK, NOK, JPY, LTL, LVL DIGITAL: PM, GDP, MNT, OK, HD, CG, PX, EGC, IF, PP, AP. Nanaimo Gold (info) Yes Yes Yes No No No No No No No No Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Offers automated BTC <--> digital currency trading. Accepts cash deposited at bank. WM-Center (info) Yes Yes No No Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Supports buy and sell BTC to WU/MG, bank wire transfers, cash. Instant exchange Bitcoins <-> Pecunix, c-gold, Paxum, PayPal, Egopay and others. 24/7/365 support in English, Russian and Spanish. btcx.se No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Buy Bitcoins in Svenska Kronor (SEK) with local bank transfer. Blockchain (info) Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Buy Bitcoins using BitInstant (U.S., Brazil and Russia), Barclay's Pingit (GBP), or with a Phone Deposit method in more than a dozen countries. Bitcoil (info) No No No No No No No No No No Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Buy and sell Bitcoins with bank transfers in Israel Bits of Gold LTD (info) No No No No No No No No No No Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No First registered company in Israel offering secure, same-day Bitcoin Buy/Sell services to the Israeli market. Bitcoins Now (info) No No No No No No Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No No Buy and Sell Bitcoins in Australia Only. Cash deposits in Australia at any Westpac, NAB, ANZ or Commonwealth branch. IgotLogo.png Igot (info) Yes Yes Yes No No No Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes Yes No No No No No No No No No No No No Yes No No No No No No No No Bitcoin BUY, SELL, SEND, REQUEST. Also, BPAY payments in Australia BXlogoSM.jpeg bitXoin (info) Buy bitcoin via online ordering and bank deposit, cash over the counter at most banks throughout Australia. Fast processing, low reference rate, low commissions. Bitcoin Nordic (info), Pay using EUR and DKK bank transfer, by mail using cash or check (EUR, USD, GBP or DKK), or with cashU prepaid cards available across the Middle East and North Africa. Sirius Money, Buy and sell bitcoins with European bank transfers or cash. Paper wallets with unique design are also sold. Large purchases possible. Coinbase (info), Buy and sell bitcoins (U.S.) with a linked bank account. Instant verification available with new accounts. OKPay accepts bitcoins as a deposit method (source) BTC China (info), Add funds using ???. Withdraw CNY (Tencent and Alipay)). ECurrencyZone (info), Buy and sell bitcoins in India (INR), Bangladesh (BDT), Nepal (NPR), Malaysia (MYR), and Singapore (SGD). Purchase with cash deposit at a bank. Canadian Bitcoins (info), Buy/Sell Bitcoins with Canadian Funds ($CAD). Cash deposit methods. Cash out to cash in-the-mail, cheque, bank transfer (TD Personal Pay), and Interac. The Rock Currency Exchange, Buy or sell Bitcoins with Lindens Dollars, USD and EUR. ATM for BTC and Lindens available. dgtmkt Digital market in Malaysia. Buy Bitcoin instantly with MYR (Malaysian Ringgit). BitcoinMalaysia Bitcoin Consultancy and Trading Site. Buy Bitcoin with MYR (Malaysian Ringgit). Maybank, GIRO, MEPS.

bitcoin-otc (info), reputation based peer exchange.
Bitcoinary, another reputation based peer exchange. (source) Centraw -- global wide socially driven Bitcoin withdraw/funding/exchange point. Service provided peer to peer with escrow (no reputation needed). No exchange fee except that particular peer may (or may not) charge. Bitcoin.in.th buy or sell Bitcoins in Thailand with cash (Thai Baht, THB) via local bank deposits or transfers. Bahtcoin (info), buy or sell Bitcoins in Thailand with cash (Thai Baht, THB), as well sell financial means online (Thai mobile phone top ups, gaming/VoIP cards, etc.) btc2usd, Buys BTC for USD through various methods (at avg bid price). NON-INSTANTANEOUS, usually takes 12 hrs to confirm and finalize. Also sells BTC if you request it (at avg ask price). London Bitcoin Exchange, Buy/Sell BTC with cash in London. Accepts cash, Moneybookers, Pokerstars USD, Liqpay, Alertpay, Perfect Money and more. Schweinehaus.de, exchange between Rheingold and bitcoin BitPiggy (info), Simple Australian dollar <-> bitcoin currency exchange. Mang Sweeney (info), Send PHP remittance using bitcoins to Philippines. Local in-person trade or cash-out deposited to your bank or recipient's bank in Philippines, or withdrawn from various remittance centers. bitcoin.hu buy or sell bitcoins with others in Hungary using cash (Hungarian Forint, HUF) BitcoinsInBerlin.com (info), buy and sell bitcoins for cash (EUR) in-the-mail, cash in-person trade (Berlin), Western Union, Moneygram (cash-out), and SEPA bank transfer. mercaBit.eu (info), buy bitcoins using (EUR) Ukash, Neosurf and HalCash (Hal-Cash). Intrade Tx, Intrade Bitcoin Transaction eXchange offers Bitcoin to Intrade(USD) deposits for predictions market betting. ValutaPay Corporation, flexible payment solutions for online store checkout and donations based on Bitcoin digital currency with Exchange Bitcoin->USD/EUR. Free online Bitcoin wallet for registered members. Withdraw/Payout via credit card (Visa/Mastercard) deposit, bank transfer or Bitcoin transaction. Lilion Transfer Buy/Sell (Accepts BTC), 15 world currencies, 12 payment processors, the biggest exchanger in Central Europe Bitcoin Plus Mexico (info), buy and sell bitcoins for cash in Mexican Pesos (MXN) BitAurum.eu Gold Merchant also selling bitcoins for Euro SEPA Bank transfers or cash (located in Bayreuth, northern Bavaria, Germany). artaBit (info), Buy and sell bitcoins using Indonesian Rupiah (IDR). itBit (info), Sophisticated bitcoin trading platform built on today's trading technology standards. Buy and sell Bitcoins in USD/EUR/SGD. IgotLogo.png Igot (info), a Bitcoin exchange with eWallet functions that allows you to securely buy, sell, send, and receive Bitcoin. It operates a BTC/USD market with support for various currencies for deposit and withdrawal, like USD, AUD, GBP, EUR, INR, SGD, NZD. asmoney (info), A payment processor based on cryptographic currencies, Provide merchants and masspayment for Bitcoin Bulk/Large-sized Trades Bitcoins Direct, Direct purchases, $1,000 to $6,000 USD funded using cash deposit at 16,000 local branchs (Bank Of America, Wells Fargo, or PNC Bank) or by bank wire. BXlogoSM.jpeg bitXoin (info) Buy bitcoin via online ordering and bank deposit, cash over the counter at most banks throughout Australia. Fast processing, low reference rate, low commissions. Contact support to arrange and negotiate transactions up to USD $1,000,000

BitPay (info), Direct purchases, $10,000 USD and higher paid for with bank wire or other approved method. Casascius, Cash-out your bitcoins $50K and up paid by bank wire. IgotLogo.png Igot (info), No max restrictions or limits on Withdrawals/Deposits, Buy/Sell, Send/Request operations. Gift/Debit Cards Bitcoin Gift Cards Buy Australian Gift Cards and pay with Bitcoin Cards4Coin.com Offering over 100 gifts cards in both physical and electronic format as well as donations to charities on your behalf that do not accept Bitcoin directly. Gyft Gift cards for bitcoins on your smartphone Favicon b4c.jpg bit4coin.net (info) Buy bitcoin gift cards/vouchers online with Euros and redeem for bitcoin at bit4coin.net. Ideal as gift or for people new to bitcoin. BitCC Exchange Bitcoins for real VISA debit cards. Truly anonymous, no personal details required. Card details will be sent by email. Cash4Coins Cash, debit/gift cards, virtual debit/gift cards, western union and other currencies for bitcoins BIPS.gif BIPS Redeemable Gift Card (info) Withdraw your bitcoins to a redeemable gift certificate. GiftsForCoins.com Gift cards for various stores and restaurants as well as miscellaneous gifts (chocolates, etc). BTCinstant Exchange bitcoins for a Virtual MasterCard and receive it instantly to your e-mail. SteamLoader Buy Steam Wallet Codes and receive them after one confirmation. Spend Bitcoins Exchange your bitcoins for Coles Meyer gift cards (AUD). BitcoinCodes Buy Microsoft (XBox Live) Points, PSN value, Nintendo points, EVE Online, World of Warcraft (WoW) and more. Cartão BitCoin (info) Reload your debit card using bitcoins (offered to Brazilians, accepted at over 10,000 locations in Brazil) GiftCard BTC Amazon gift cards, denominations of $20, $50 and $100. Lyoness prepaid gift card Purchase gift cards for Chevron, Walmart, and dozens more without any fees. (Dwolla required?) eGifter offers Bitcoin payments for 100+ eGift Cards! Fast and simple checkout process with no additional fees InstantlyBank Purchase anonymous reloadable Debit Cards and Virtual Credit Cards with Bitcoin Bitcoin-ricarica.com Buy Italian services and gift cards with Bitcoin Card For Coin Exchange your spare gift cards(Target, Starbucks, etc) for bitcoin. USA iTunes Gift Cards Buy USA iTunes Gift Cards with Bitcoins Precious & Base Metals/Coins Alexchenko Silver Co., Silver retail located in the United States of America. Provides customers with quality silver products from several leading mints around the world. Accepts Bitcoin and PayPal for purchases. Express delivery to customers in the US & Canada. AmagiMetals.com, Global gold & silver dealer. Core values are privacy, fast delivery, sound money, and financial responsibility. BitAurum.eu, Gold merchant located in Germany. Sells bitcoins for bank transfer. EU-wide shipping. Bitgildcom.jpegBitgild.com, Gold and Silver merchant. Sells gold bars,gold coins,silver bars, silver coins and physical silver bitcoins. Fast delivery, privacy guaranteed, insured shipping. EU-wide shipping. BitcoinAg, purchase Silver rounds and gold for a low price. Custom ordering available. Pricematch any valid bullion dealer that deals in bitcoins. BitCoinCommodities, Gold and Silver Coins and Bars / Bullion. Physical Silver Bitcoins (1g .999 Au rounds). Saving plans for miners. Shipping via FedeX to the whole world, dropshipping from the US to a variety of countries - best shipping conditions ever! Tracking on every order. See also: My rating on bitcoin-otc. BitSilver.US A weight-based Bitcoin to Silver exchange. Real-time pricing, insured delivery. BTCAg Trade your bitcoins for silver bullion coins. Bullionbit.com Purchase physical silver and gold in bullion or coin format. Casascius Physical Bitcoins, coins with a real bitcoin value embedded inside. Coin.me.uk, Buy silver, gold coins, bars and other items. Plus non-precious novelties clearly marked. Pay with Bitcoin. Coinabul.com (info), The biggest Bitcoin/Gold Marketplace. Selling a wide selection of gold and silver. Bars, coins, and international shipping. Insurance options as well. Tracking on every order! CoinedBits.com Novelty physical Bitcoin Coins. Chariot Trading Company (info), precious metals, base metals, and rare coins Midasbitcoin, Buy a real Silver Coin with your bitcoins. Gold to Bitcoins, Sell Your gold for Bitcoins. MJB Monetary Metals, Investment grade bullion products for bitcoin. Shire Silver, trade grade small denomination precious metal cards. A better bullion for everyday trade. GoldExpert.com, Bigger quantities of investment gold. 1-2 day delivery or pickup from our office in Estonia. hopea.fi, Buy gold, silver and cash with bitcoins from physical location in Finland. WiserMetals.com, Private | Secure | Wealth - Gold and silver Royal Canadian Mint Coins .9999 pure. Oxbridge House, Inc. A San Francisco based company specializing in precious metals, coins, and bullion. Anonymous Exchanges Exchanges in which a counterparty operates anonymously has an increased risk of loss. Refer to the Secure Trading for more information.

BitCash Buy US currency anonymously. Local/In-Hand Exchanges TradeYourBitcoin.com / buy and sell locally with cash - person to person - no banks involved. Localbitcoins.com Buy / sell Bitcoins directly with cash. Advanced pricing functionality. BTCspot Buy / sell Bitcoins directly. Find business partners in Your country. IgotLogo.png Igot (info), a Bitcoin exchange with eWallet functions that allows you to securely buy, sell, send, and receive Bitcoin. It operates a BTC/USD market with support for various currencies for deposit and withdrawal, like USD, AUD, GBP, EUR, INR, SGD, NZD. Bitcoin, secure, fast, and local (igot.com currently operates in Australia, New Zealand, Singapore, Hong Kong, and India). Financial See Trading with Bitcoin for broker rankings. Contracts MinerLease, Bitcoin mining contracts for investment. cex.io, The first commodity exchange website, which allows trading of bitcoin mining facilities or GHS (GigaHash per second) Trading. Equities MPEX (info), Equities exchange. PicoStocks, Equities exchange. BTC-TC, Equities exchange. CryptoStocks, Equities exchange, Option trading CoinBr.com, Broker service for trading issues on mpex. Forex AvaTrade allows you to trade in the USD/BTC instrument. xCFD allows you to deposit in BTC and trade in the USD/BTC instrument in addition to usual Forex/CFDs. Plus500 Was the first Forex company to allow Bitcoin trading on its platform. LiteForex, deposit and withdraw bitcoins to your LiteForex account. 1Broker Advanced forex and CFD trading. Bitcoin denominated account only. Bit4X Trade Forex market (including Gold and Silver) with Bitcoin denominated MetaTrader account (no fiat conversion) Futures ICBIT (info), Use bitcoins to buy and sell futures contracts for Gold, Crude (WTI), and the BTC/USD. MPEx), Use bitcoins to buy and sell futures contracts for many commodities, indexes, and more. Lending Bitbond.net (info), Peer to peer Bitcoin debt instruments. BTCJam, Peer to Peer Bitcoin Lending. Options BTClevels (info) Bitcoin Binary Option. A completely fair and transparent way to earn money both on high-rate and low-rate Bitcoin fluctuations. Listings and quotations are taken directly from HITBTC real-time. API, 24/7 support BTCOracle Predict and bet on the future price of bitcoin | Anonymous, fast, instant play | The leading binary option exchange in bitcoin. MPOE (info), Use bitcoins to buy and sell Bitcoin CALL and PUT option contracts. Princeton Digital Exchange(info), Limited risk derivatives trading platform. Trade binary options safely and securely. Tools myBitWorth - allows you to track your bitcoin holdings over multiple addresses and portfolios on the bitcoin securities exchanges. Bitcoin Real Time - Monitor all of your bitcoin addresses! Safely. Securely. In Real Time. For Free Bitcoin eWallets The below services are not exchanges between currencies and Bitcoin, but rather to transfer owned bitcoins to other individuals and are generally designed for ease of use and convenience. These services are normally called eWallets

Bitcoin Banking and Ewallets BCTIP Printable Bitcoin Tips Bitcoinera.net Bitcoin Wallet with 6% monthly interest on deposits. BitcoinWebWallet No sign-up required; simple and secure mobile ready web wallet. Bitdeposit Offers interest on bitcoin deposits, also offers loans, price fall insurance and startup funding. InsuredCoin Offers insured BitCoin transactions for partner businesses. BitcoinWallet.in Simple and secure Ewallet with Bitcoin mixer Blockchain Online/hybrid wallet with in-browser key encryption and wallet app for Android and iOS with QR code support etc. xCoinMoney Online wallet for instant payment and subscriptions Coinbase Browser based eWallet, uses cold storage but not a javascript based hybrid wallet Coinkite.gif Coinkite (info) Hosted Bitcoin Wallet. Uses HSM to secure funds in allocated matter, allows users to have private key copy and use Debit Cards. Provide merchant solutions including hardware Point of Sale terminal. Coinb.in UK hosted in browser wallet with raw and advanced features (in beta) Easywallet.org Ewallet with Android and iOS web clients, QR codes, and currency conversion Kipochi (info) Bitcoin wallet for mobile phones, includes M-Pesa integration for Kenya Paytunia (info) A hosted ewallet PikaPay Logo.png PikaPay (info) The Bitcoin wallet for Twitter StrongCoin Another javascript based bitcoin wallet ValutaPay Free online Bitcoin Wallet and payment gateway for donation and online stores PLAYTIN Very secure online wallet with mixer, free instant user to user transfers, 2nd factor authentication and a lot more. Bitcoin payment systems The below services facilitate payments in Bitcoins. Different from exchanges Bitcoins are treaded as means of payment and not as financial good. Different from eWallets the provided services do not aim to store Bitcoins and facilitate transfers between individuals but to provide smooth Bitcoin payments.

BIPS.gif BIPS (info), Bitcoin merchant solutions, point of sale system, mobile checkout, currency conversion and withdraw to bank account in the merchants local currency to any country. BitKassa Bitcoin payment solution, customer pays bitcoins - merchant gets euro. No fee (NL). BitPay (info), merchant payment processing system BitUtils Merchant BitUtils Merchant solution enables merchants to accept bitcoins with simple HTML buttons. No programming or server admin skills required. 0.5% fee for incoming BTCs. Coinbase Provide online merchant services. Coinkite.gif Coinkite Provide merchant solutions and hardware Point of Sale terminal. PikaPay Logo.pngPikaPay (info) Send and receive payments to any Twitter account. BitVendor, Bitcoin, Cash, and Debit Card Point of Sale System The BFG Program (Bitcoins For Gets) - Link to swfchan.com and earn bitcoins GoCoin GoCoin International Payment Processing for Bitcoin BitcoinPay (info), Payment gateway on Bitcoin network for merchants in Europe [PLN, CZK, EUR, USD]. Coin For Coffee Provides in-store payment with bitcoin at retailers(Currently Starbucks and expanding to other stores in US, CAN, UK. Escrow Escrow services provide a method for buyer and seller to transact more securely.

BTCrow Escrow with arbitration service. ThruCoin Automated, low cost escrow. S.O. Escrow Truste privacy policy certified, Godaddy verified and certified, incorporated in Canada since 2003 provides online escrow. BTC-Asia.com - Secure Bitcoin Escrows Trusted and automated Bitcoin escrow service managed by BitcoinMalaysia.com. Internet & Mobile services Bitcoin-related Eligius offers a simple low-fee for non-standard and sub-cent transactions BTCBalanceWatcher monitors a specified Bitcoin address and notifies users of any balance changes via SMS. Bit-Miner, advanced form of group buys or collective mining; trade mining shares. BitMail (info), send Bitcoins in e-mail. Good for introducing new people to Bitcoin. Bitcoinreminder.com , Bitcoin Exchange rate E-mail & SMS warn/reminder service (in beta test) PayMe Cards Printed plastic cards for your physical wallet with a QR of your Bitcoin payment address. CryptFolio Keep track of all your cryptocurrencies (BTC/LTC/NMC/FTC), investments and equities using public addresses and read-only APIs. Connectivity SecureVPN.to - SecureVPN offers you a non logging privacy service with fast servers from all over the world. Protocols we offer are OpenVPN, IKEv2, SOCKS5 and HTTP Proxy. BinTube.com - Unlimited Usenet Access. SSL. US and EU servers. High Retention. Usenet Search. Usenet Software. Perfect Privacy VPN - No Limits, No Logs, High Speed Quality OpenVPN/PPTP/L2TP/SSH2/SOCKS5 Services. 30+ Servers worldwide. FinchVPN - Free and Premium VPN - Unlimited Premium VPN. No Logging. Lowest Price! We accepts vast number of payment methods (inc bitcoin) and we have 50+ servers including Asia servers IronSocket VPN Services - Safe and private VPN services, PPTP/L2TP, SOCKS5 proxy and smart DNS Leak Protection Proxy services at very low prices - based in Hong Kong and accepts Bitcoin. TrilightZone Providing Privacy Services Since 2005 - Including OpenVPN and SSH Tunnel Linux Shells - Choose from Multiple Offshore Jurisdictions ! VPN Service - Private Internet Access provides PPTP/OpenVPN/L2TP+IPSec access as well as socks5. Multiple gateways worldwide. Over 300+ servers and one of the first VPNs to accept Bitcoin. TorGuard - Anonymous VPN & Proxy Provider. No Logs, Supports PPTP/L2TP/OpenVPN/Stealth protocols. 5 Simultaneous connections per account. HostVPN - Premium VPN service provider. Supports PPTP/L2TP&IPSec/OpenVPN/Stunnel protocols. Simultaneous connections on one account. Cryptohippie.com - 2+ jurisdictionally-aware hops, anti-correlation, internal DNS, secure email, smart phone protection, chat, more. 19 BTC/year. VPNme.com - Fast,Anonymous VPN that is p2p friendly, unlimited bandwidth and really has no logging. Plans from $5.83/mo. cryptocloud no compromise VPN service that accepts bitcoins 50% off with #Snowden HideMyNet - 20+ Servers, PPTP/L2TP/OpenVPN/HTTP & DNS Proxy Included - Starting at 6.99$/mo to 48.99$/yr. Privacy.li - Anonymous offshore hosting, controversial contents possible. Also VPN, SSH tunnels. BTguard - VPN and bittorent proxy service for bitcoins azirevpn anonymous VPN, gives free bayfiles premium accounts with VPN Proxy.sh really affordable VPN plans, starting at 2 bucks get 10% off with code ILUVPROXYSH IVPN long standing VPN based out of Malta and EFF member Bitusenet.com - Unlimited Usenet Access. 1 bitcoin for a months access. SSL. 50 connections. 1100 day retention. VersaVPN L.L.C. – Affordable PPTP, L2TP and OpenVPN US, Europe and Asia servers.We secure internet connection, encrypts data transmission, enable users to view blocked websites and VoIP software all unlimited, all access. Bitronic VPN – Affordable PPTP, L2TP and OpenVPN US and Europe servers. Secure SSL unmetered VPN you can buy with Bitcoin, SSH Tunnel/100MBit Connection. Puxi.me – Anonymize & encrypt your Torrents. Hide BitTorrent from ISP. Anonymous IP address. Unlimited use. Fast speeds. SSH tunnel. BitsForCoins OpenVPN and PPTP featuring static IPs and static routed subnets, unlimited traffic, no filtration of content or protocols, no NAT, run any listening service, bypass port/protocol/speed limits at your ISP and be impervious to monitoring (even at WiFi hotspots), servers utilize proper MTU to cope with broken websites with improper pMTUd. We are directly peered with the fastest backbones and with popular sites like Google, Youtube and Facebook. We accept Bitcoins. SecurityKISS Free and paid VPN. High speed and completely anonymous. Direct Bitcoin payments. TorVPN Fast VPN provider with OpenVPN + PPTP + SSH tunnelling. Payments accepted instantly (Bitcoin, CC, PayPal, Alertpay, CashU). Simple Proxy List Public Proxy List of ~1000 proxies checked every 30 minutes Free Public Proxy Servers List - Regularly updated HTTP/SOCKS open/public proxy list AirVPN.org, VPN using OpenVPN for client software, 2048-bit encryption oVPN.to Anonymous VPN Service with 10 Countries, 10+ dedicated Server, Portforwarding, SSH-SOCKS5 cryptoanarchy.us Prepaid clear wireless 4g internet service in 80 US cities HomeVPN.com Highspeed VPN service with OpenVPN and optional private IP (starting at €2.91/month) JonDonym Anonymous Proxy Servers; uses - similar to Tor - multiple independent Mixes. Different plans starting at 0.5 BTC. Mullvad, anonymous VPN service SSH Fan SSH, VPN Account, Port-forwarding, SSH-SOCKS5 CryptoVPN Exclusive VPN Service! has 18 available countries PPTP, OpenVPN and double OpenVPN connections. in-Disguise VPN Anonymous DoubleVPN, OpenVPN and PPTP VPN Service! Easy GUI for Windows, MacOS X and Linux! BeeVPN Privacy and Protection done right! oVPN.to, High Anonymity VPN Service with SOCKS-Proxies and Portforwarding. Primercato Network Services, Anonymous UK/US Squid proxy servers WhatTheServer.me Offshore(Netherlands, Sweden, Russia, Romania) OpenVPN Tunnels we accept anonymous sign-ups via tormail and Bitcoin. We can also offer Port forwarding or Static IPs via our advanced/custom plans. BlackVPN With the premium VPN service from blackVPN you can surf freely, privately & without borders. SimpleVPN Premier VPN service provider with servers in 19 countries and world class customer service. Bypass GeoIP restrictions and country specific filters. We support OpenVPN/SSL, PPTP and L2TP/IPSec on Windows, OSX, Linux, iOS and Android. ** Now 50% off until Jan 2013 ** dns.canhasinter.net Bypass pay-for WiFi networks via DNS tunneling. Uses Iodine. Only accepts Bitcoin. NVPN VPN provider with port forwarding azire vpn unlimited bandwidth PPTP and OpenVPN, no logs PRQ anonymous VPN tunnels, shell, web, VPS and email hosting in Sweden SeedStuff Premium Seedboxes and Rutorrent Hosting with Servers in Canada, France and the UK DTSLeech seedbox service accepting bitcoin with VPN and SSH access seedboxes.cc seedbox provider with high speed boxes zorrovpn vpn servers in 17 countries has a Tor+VPN combo service.11% off with code schoolofprivacy bolehvpn very popular anonymous VPN vpnpop PPTP, IPSec & OpenVPN services switchvpn Fast VPN Service with Servers in US, UK, Netherlands, Germany, Canada, Switzerland, Malaysia, France, Singapore, Hong Kong, Latvia, Sweden more proxies sells private proxies now accepting bitcoin. earthvpn very cheap VPN service starting at 4$ a month, 20% OFF with code SCHOOLOFPRIVACYVPN Seed4.Me – Private VPN Club. Accepts Bitcoins, provides 7 days for free. Requires invitation to register. Most affordable and reliable VPN provider: $3.33 per month. Design Creative Difoundo - We design websites to suit the current minimalistic trend. Now accepting bitcoins. Giant Oak Studios - Professional 3D art and design. 12+ years experience in creating eye-popping visuals for the games industry. 3D/2D character design and animation, iOs development FarmGeek Ltd - You reap what we code FarmGeek Ltd: Professional web and app development in the UK. We can bring your ideas to life. We are a quality web firm, so we provide Ruby, NodeJS, android and PHP5.4 development (including WordPress). Contact us for a quote and make sure to mention bitcoin! 10% discount for ? paying clients! DamienKing.net, Professional web and graphic designer since 1998. Keen to help promote Bitcoin and so will offer discounts on work when paid in BTC. For Bitcoin (info), Bitcoin Site Design and Bitcoin Branding Services for members and related opportunities. LAYER.1.GFX Technomadic Graphic Designer and Urban Calligraffiti Artist, Logo Design, Web Design, Customized QR Codes, Social Media Services, Graffiti Art and Workshops, BodyArt, Japanese Calligraphy, Proofreading (DE/EN), Consulting for Art and Music Projects, further Creative Contacts in Berlin, Vienna, London on request Ambivert Creative, Branding and identity. Logo, web, and print. Discounts for Bitcoin, and for clients promoting decentralized solutions. Sherbet Lemon, Currently offering custom logo design for the equivalent of $60 Microtronix ESolutions, Professional web design and programming, 10+ years in the industry with clients in 7 countries of the world. WPLG: Graphic Design Argentino. Logos, advertising, flyers. Inserted in the market since 2005. Speed and customer satisfaction. KentDesignSolutions: Fantastic, affordable, UK based web design solutions. Lubi Kocheleva - Freelance Web & Graphic Designer Affordable & Personal Graphic and Web Design Services, based in the Channel Islands, UK Student Web Designer, Student designer offering low prices for any web project. Leo Koppelkamm, Illustration and font design. Font licenses available at reduced rates. web banner creatives CreationsByRichie.com Banner Web Design Fast Service, Low Prices Starts @$9.00 all banner sizes banner ads & animated gifs, Website webstore top header branding. Web banner ads example sizes - 300x250 banner, 728x90 banner, Facebook covers 851x351. Banner Creative, Business Logos, Print Media Designs, Webmaster services and More Services Since 2006 - We Accept BitCoins - Visit Today. Web Visible Online Marketing - A boutique SEO/SEM company in Perth, Western Australia. Accelerated Global - SEO, Social Media and Internet Marketing Website Design - Providing professional web services including SEO (search engine optimization), Internet marketing and social media support (Twitter, Facebook, YouTube etc) for existing websites, and building brand new websites to meet client specifications. FarmGeek Ltd - Professional web and app development in the UK, providing Ruby, NodeJS, android and PHP5.4 development (including WordPress). Contact for a quote, and mention bitcoin for a 10% discount. BitMate - Bitcoin Plugin Development and Payment Solutions for WordPress daneos.com Professional - Web developing and website administration. Also providing other IT related services. fiverr.com - Bitcoin now accepted. bitcoinerr.com - Like Fiverr.com, but charges 3.25% + 0.0005btc per order and pays in less than 24h. For Bitcoin (info) - Helps people earn bitcoins through Micro Transactions. Sigil93 - Small group of web developers that specialize in SEO, web design, WordPress template creation and setup, and web programming. SEO specialist has over 5 years of experience working for Fortune 500 clients. Search Tempo - A Brisbane based SEO agency. It has a variety of SEO services available using Bitcoin including the Mister Purple Link Sandwich. Bitcoin2cdkey.com - Professional facebook page templates in html5 animated. capitaldesignfx.com - Website Design & Development with Joomla & WordPress, Advertising, Print Design Services. Provides 10% discount for Bitcoin shoppers. AmberShadow Design - website design. HolmePage Web Marketing - SEO and Adwords. BitcoinBulletin.com - WordPress Setup, PHP Web Apps JustinBull.ca - Web design, PHP with MySQL/SQLite programming solutions UpgradeYa - Drupal web design, theming, module development, and hosting. Offers discount off normal cost when paying with bitcoin. Tangerineworks Web Development - NZ/UK-based WordPress Guru - PHP/MySQL/HTML/CSS/JS/Ajax etc. 11+ years exp. 10% discount for BTC Richard Caetano - Accepting bitcoins for software development and design. iPhone, iPod Touch, and iPad, Ruby on Rails, and Database/SQL programming. Sherbet Lemon - Currently offering custom logo design for the equivalent of $60. Bitcoin shopping - 0.065 Bitcoin per day Websolution StarPlugins.com - Official website of Cloud Zoom and other professional jQuery plugins. Kondratov Labs LLC - Software development and design. Implementing bitcoin checkouts, auction systems, e-commerce. Ember/WebObjects. Ann Jones Digital - Internet Marketing - Web design, social media marketing, and campaigns. Specialties: mobile sites, Joomla & eCommerce. Liira Media - Web Marketing - A full service web marketing agency specializing in website design and development, search engine optimization, social media management, pay-per-click campaign management, and brand/reputation management. All work is responsive to all mobile devices, standard. Provides free quotes. Mixed Media Marketing - Mixed Media Marketing Offer WordPress & Membership Development, Digital Marketing Services, and Mobile Optimization. Okotto - Offers web design and web development services starting from as low as £100 ($150 USD). Skills include but are not limited to, HTML(5), CSS(3), PHP, MySQL, jQuery, Javascript, Photoshop, Illustrator, WordPress and SEO. Contact us using the form on out website for more details. Rocketmade - A web, iOS and Android development shop specializing in building apps for startups, based in USA. Offers a 5-15% discount to clients who pay in Bitcoin. Open to equity projects depending on the client, the idea, etc. Art ART4B.IT - ART4BIT.COM We are the first online art gallery that sell exclusively for bitcoin. We live on donation from our artists and art lovers. Bert Green Fine Art, Fine Art Gallery in Chicago. Contemporary Fine Art. Discounts and free domestic shipping for buyers using Bitcoin. Matt Goerzen, 3D modeled paintings for collection and display in virtual environments. David McDermott, professional 3D modeling and animation. hsf_context's Random Art Booth, Random digital art. Erik White, Gravitational Art, unique abstract paintings. Hi res images available FREE. Web Hosting IT Itch The first full service web hosting company actively advocating for internet privacy and anonymity and offering bitcoin payment by default. Dedicated servers, VPS, Shared hosting, domain names, email, SSL + more. SuperBitHost.com offers you Offshore bitcoin hosting in major Offshore zones at one place. Our Offshore servers are backed by branded hardware and 24/7 support. Managed/Unmanaged dedicated server, VPS and shared hosting for your needs. *Upfront payment discounts: 3 months [-5%], 6 months [-7%], 12 months [-10%] Hosterbox.com Hosterbox is now accepting Bitcoins simply place your order and pay with Bitcoin at checkout, Pay for Domain registrations, Web hosting, VPS's, Dedicated servers and Reseller hosting with Bitcoin. Bitcoin payment is made using BitPay and the invoice is generated at checkout. BitcoinWebHosting.net offers extreme performance and reliability, backed with a 45-day Money Back Guarantee and 99.99% Uptime. Offering shared, VPS, and dedicated hosting, along with DDoS protection, domains, SSLs, and Sucuri Malware Removal. QHoster - Shared, VPS, and dedicated hosting and domains. Servers in USA and Europe. Shared/VPS hosting with instant activation after payment. HostingBuY For through a few simple steps, activate your share hosting account. Bitcoin payment is made using BitPay and the invoice is generated at checkout. Gigahost was established in 2005 in Denmark as a hosting company for those who'd like to be able to host multiple web sites at the same place, without having to pay unfair fees or buy several accounts for each page. Gigahost provides support for an unlimited amount of web pages, domains, email addresses, databases, and traffic. TrilightZone Providing Privacy Services Since 2005 - Including Offshore Hosting - Choose from Multiple Offshore Jurisdictions ! Web World Ireland Founded in 1998, Web World is Ireland's first hosting company to accept Bitcoins. Our services include web site hosting, server co-location, virtual private and dedicated server hosting. LovingHosting Bitcoin Hosting :: Buy Web Hosting, Pay with Bitcoin MonsterMegs - Since 2010 MonsterMegs has been providing reliable, affordable, and secure Web Hosting, Semi-Dedicated Hosting, and Reseller Hosting Solutions to customers of all sizes. Plans include LightSpeed Web Server, CloudLinux, Cpanel, Clustered DNS, and much more. Locations in the US and the Netherlands. All payable with Bitcoin. Dedicated Servers and DDoS Protection for Bitcoin by CoinsHost.com We offer bare metal Dedicated Servers, Cloud VPS, Colocation hosting in Zurich, protection from all types of DDoS attacks with guaranteed result, CDN, BTsync storage containers and other web hosting products. Hostamus Anonymous offshore hosting based in France. Pay for Shared hosting, VPS (Linux/Windows), Dedicated servers or backup storage in Bitcoin! Use Coupon "10RECURRING" for 10% discount. CrookServers.com You can buy dedicated servers and VPS Servers with Bitcoin. Our dedicated servers are available in 6 different datacenters. Bitcoin payment is made using BitPay and the invoice is generated at checkout. Server&Cloud Server & Cloud is a Swiss company established in the global market of hosting services. Top notch equipment and reliable service guarantee 100% security of the data stored in our DC. We offer small, big and large scale businesses modern services which are in a heavy demand nowadays: Dedicated Servers, Cloud Hosting, DDoS Protection and Colocation. NerdyChild.com NerdyChild have extremely cheap web hosting (from $3.99). Payments are accepted instantly (0 confirmations). They also have domain name registration, VPS and email hosting. Solar Communications GmbH Solar Communications GmbH is a data center, situated in Zurich, Switzerland that provides superior and versatile solutions for dedicated servers, Cloud hosting and DDoS protection. All our products are equipped with free basic DDoS Protection up to 10 gbit/s and 4 mpps, which proves to be very effective against most types of DDoS attacks. Solar Communications GmbH data center has a complex security system, which corresponds to the toughest of the modern security standards. Incloudibly.com Incloudibly is a Swiss web hosting company that focuses on DDoS Protected Solutions. Incloudibly offers DDoS protected Dedicated Servers, Cloud VPS, Colocation, Game Server hosting and professional DDoS protection from all types of web-based attacks with highest security protected by Swiss Federal Act on Data Protection. Exoware.net UK. Web hosting, reseller hosting, VPS, dedicated servers, domain names and SSL certificates. Select Bitcoin at checkout price will convert to BTC according to current rates. Anonymous orders not accepted; diligent with fake details. OrangeWebsite.com - Green and anonymous offshore hosting based in Iceland. Been operating since 2009. 24/7/366 online support, cPanel, Softaculous one-click installer. Designed hosting plans for forums, blogs and internet communities. Privacy.li - Anonymous offshore hosting, controversial contents possible. Also VPN, SSH tunnels. WhatTheServer Secure Offshore Web Hosting based in Netherlands(Ecatel). VPS , Shared hosting(Atomic Secure Linux Hardened Cpanel+Softaculous+CloudFlare) Bitcoin-hosting Fast, reliable and cheap UK hosting, secure full featured control pannel. 1-Click install of WordPress, Drupal, Joomla, and many more open-source blogs, forums and wikis. Bitcoin Web Hosting Ratings and Reviews - BitcoinWebHostingRatings.com A Bitcoin Web Host Ratings Website. Provider of Unbiased, In-Depth Reviews and Ratings Using a 3 Step Process. Hosting Providers are Rated on Features, Value, Uptime and Support; Then are Given a Letter Grade from F to A+. Covers Pro's and Con's, Features, Pricing and Current Coupons. DDoS protection and hosting services by SwissHosters.com SwissHosters, Swiss private company based in Zurich, introduces a wide variety of web hosting services for business and offers its customers to move up to a qualitatively new level of web infrastructure development that can meet the requirements and wishes of the most demanding clients. Zeropid.com Zeropid.com now proudly accepts Bitcoin as payment option for all type of services we offer. You can pay for shared web hosting, Domain regisrations, VPS and dedicated servers. Bitcoin invoice is generated at checkout via our payment processor Bitpay. BitaTel Cheap domains, Email and Web Hosting; Fast and reliable US based servers, cPanel hosting starting at $4.99 $3.99 a month with Nginx, PHP 5.4, Ruby, MySQL and PostgreSQL support - 1-Click installer and 24/7 Support HOTServers LLC Raid Storage / Premium Bandwidth Our shared hosting nodes are built with enterprise hardware and never oversold. HOTServers LLC Web Hosting gives you the power of cPanel , Apache, MySQL combined. Account setup is fast and mostly accounts are setup within 4-6 Hours. WordPress.com One of the largest blog hosting companies currently hosting over 56 million individual blogs. Basic service is free, but upgrades can be purchased with bitcoins. HostingBitcoin.com Hosting with Bitcoin, Domain Registration with Bitcoin, Dedicated Servers with Bitcoin. Prices are given in US$ but get converted to Bitcoin at check-out time (if choosing Bitcoin). CleverPuffin Bitcoin Web Hosting Affordable and reliable UK linux web host. Exclusively accepts Bitcoin. Can contact them to create a custom package with either linux or windows - or choose one of their ready made linux packages. cPanel-Host Inexpensive single domain and reseller cPanel Web Hosting with over 280 scripts included (Fantastico, Softaculous), in 24 languages, and domain registration; Server locations USA and Europe; accepting Bitcoin. GigaTux VPS and web hosting solutions in the UK, USA and Germany. Accepts Bitcoins on all products. L3server Dedicated Servers and VPS, data center locations in U.S. and Germany; accepting Bitcoin. Optical Cube Web Hosting, VPS and IT consulting offers Shared Web Hosting, custom Virtual Private Servers powered by KVM, IT consulting and web development. Prices starting at 0.107 BTC/month Quantum Kiwi Web & I.T Services Premium Cloud cPanel Hosting - Easy to use system & anonymous options available, hosting starts from $4.95 / 0.05BTC. Bitcoin Web Hosting, The Bitcoin web hosting company is the affordable and tech savvy Bitcoin ready web hosting company. Bitcoin is the only currency we accept. BitHosting.BIZ Web Hosting, anonymous web hosting based on Linux and Windows. Tons of free professional features included. Highest security standards, friendly english-speaking support and much more. Secure and anonymous payment with Bitcoin. Bitserv - Suckless Windows Hosting for Bitcoins BitcoinWebHost, cPanel Webhosting with 24/7 Tech Support! SFTP included free, Wallet server is available! Bluetreehost - Since 2007, Instant Setup, Now Accepting Bitcoins! 10% off code: BITCOIN BuildYourVPS, Market prices in BTC for Virtual and Dedicated servers. Servers for less than $2/month in BTC. OpenVZ based hosting from Portland Oregon. Terms of service apply. Cinfu Hosting Solutions Cheap Web Hosting and VPS Servers with unmetered data transfer (servers in Germany and USA), Domains registration. EVALinux Free and Open Source Software consulting. We speak Spanish/English. We specialize in: Virtualization (private and public), LAMP, Networking, Security, Backup and Encryption. We offer personalized hosting solutions as well. james-b.ch (info), Friendly Web/Data Hosting and SSH access (starts at ~0.022 BTC/GiB/week) Kattare Internet Services Colocation, Dedicated Servers, Clusters, Shared Hosting, Domain Registration, SSL Certificates, etc. We support Tomcat/JSP, Apache/PHP, Apache/PERL, Apache/FastCGI, Apache/Ruby, MySQL, Postgres, & more. 15 years in business. Microtronix Hosting, Linux unlimited web hosting. 50% off for using bitcoin currency, promo code "bitcoin2011". Automatic pmt processing and hosting provisioning, auto bitcoin payment processing. Shell.TOR Prepaid shell account and web hosting on a secure server, accepting Bitcoin payments instantly. Set up any number of sites on one account. Very fast, no traffic limit. Bitronic Technologies, Bitronic Technologies accepts Bitcoin and provides cheap shared hosting, cheap reseller hosting,Linux VPS, dedicated hosting and SSL Certificates. Winn Host Reliable Offshore Web Hosting based in Singapore. Dedicated, VPS, shared hosting and Domains for Bitcoin. Litespeed Servers with cPanel. PythonAnywhere is a Python development and hosting environment that displays in your web browser and runs on our servers. They're already set up with everything you need. It's easy to use, fast, and powerful. We accept BTC for annual subscriptions. Phurix Reliable and affordable UK based web hosting and domain names for bitcoins. 37SOLUTIONS Technology Services Buy a slice of Rackspace's premium, reliable and scalable Cloud Sites web hosting with bitcoin. We also offer Exchange and POP/IMAP hosting, website development, database administration and computer repair. Contact us to order dedicated servers or cloud servers too. Phost.nl - Phost.nl offers quality cPanel hosting in the Netherlands for SMEs and private persons. We accept Bitcoin payments from clients who live in The Netherlands. Okotto - Fast, reliable and affordable Shared Hosting starting from only £1.95 ($2.97 USD) per month. Mini Hosting from £2.49 ($3.80 USD) per year. Selectel.com Russian-based provider of cloud/dedicated servers. Accepts bitcoin via OKPay. Front Range Hosting Provider of cloud hosting (KVM & OpenVZ), domain registration, SSL certificates, Anycast DNS, and CDN. Hawk Host Canadian based web hosting provider offering shared, reseller, virtual private servers, and semi-dedicated hosting. Shared hosting is available in 6 international locations. Plans start at just $3.29 per month! Simple-webhosting.eu "Virtualized web hosting" based in Amsterdam. One simple subscription starting at €1.48. Rockhoster.com Providing Offshore Web Hosting and Onshore Web Hosting with PHP, MYSQL, cPanel and 24/7 Support. Unbeatable price starting from $1.99/mo. Locations offered are USA, France and Netherlands.

Dedicated/Virtual Server Hosting See also price comparison of bitcoin-accepting VPS providers.

Name IPv6 KVM XEN OpenVZ Dedicated Servers Web Hosting Domain Names SSL Certificates Anonymous Registration Tor / Anonymous proxy user friendly Off-Site Backup Services Description IT Itch Yes Yes No No Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes IT Itch offers privacy protected web solutions - anonymous web hosting and domain registration with bitcoin payment by default. SuperBitHost.com No Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes SuperBitHost.com offers bitcoin hosting solutions in major offshore zones! Grab you Dedicated server, VPS or shared hosting in minutes. We offer also DDos protection service, SSL certificates and cheap domain names. We accept mainly Bitcoin. Hosterbox.com No No No Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes No Yes Hosterbox.com offers premium managed shared hosting, VPS's, Reseller hosting and Domain registrations. Bitcoin payment is made using BitPay and the invoice is generated at checkout. BitcoinWebHosting.net Yes No Yes No Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes BitcoinWebHosting.net offers unparalleled performance, 24x7x365 support, and a 99.99% uptime guarantee. We offer solutions for everyone: shared, VPS, dedicated, DDOS protection, domain names, SSLs, and Sucuri Malware Removal. Order Anonymously! ServerAstra.com Yes Yes No No Yes No No No No Yes Yes ServerAstra.com is a division of Azar-A Ltd. which offers various IT services including KVM VDS, Dedicated Servers, Co-Location and DDoS protection. Bitcoins are processed manually, however they give a discount of 10% for payments in Bitcoins. QHoster.com Yes No Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Instant hosting, domains and Linux/Windows VPS in USA, UK, Germany, Switzerland, France, dedicated servers. Root/Administrator access, 1GBit port, instant upgrades, cPanel (option). LibertyVPS.net No Yes No No No Yes No No Yes Yes No LibertyVPS.net offers offshore KVM VPS and Webhosting, starting from $4.99. Bitcoins are processed via a shared wallet to ensure customer privacy. CoinsHost.com No No Yes No Yes No No No Yes Yes Yes We offer bare metal Dedicated Servers, Cloud VPS, Colocation hosting in Zurich, protection from all types of DDoS attacks with guaranteed result, CDN, BTsync storage containers and other web hosting products. SwissHosters.com No No Yes No Yes No No No Yes Yes Yes Our services are presented by Dedicated hosting service, Cloud Hosting, Protection from distributed denial-of-service attack and services of Colocation centre. We provide our customers with high performance hardware, efficient business solutions, multiplex redundant connections and proved network capacity. SwissHosters ensures regular work with the minimum of waiting time and the remarkable connection speed. Yourserver.se Yes No No Yes No No No No Yes Yes No Yourserver.se offers virtual servers in Sweden with unlimited traffic from Tier 1 operators, latest Xeon CPUs, IPv6 and full root access starting from €2 per month. Exoware No No Yes No Yes Yes Yes Yes No No Yes UK and EU. Web hosting from £1.95 ($3.15), Reseller Hosting from £12.95 ($20.85), VPS from £7.95 ($12.80), Dedicated Servers from £29.95 ($48.00), SSL Certificates from £9.95 ($16.00), Managed Off-Site Backup from £2.95 ($4.75) per month. 15% off code 'bitcointradewiki'. Choose 'Bitcoin' payment method at checkout, currency conversation done at checkout-time. Hostamus No Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes No Yes Yes Yes ? Hostamus.com has been offering anonymous offshore hosting for almost two years. Currently offers hosting in France only. Payment made through Bitpay. Hostamus is known for allowing tools/programs most providers don't allow on their networks. Solar Communications GmbH No No Yes No Yes No No No Yes Yes Yes Solar Communications GmbH is a data center, situated in Zurich, Switzerland that provides superior and versatile solutions for dedicated servers, Cloud hosting and DDoS protection. All our products are equipped with free basic DDoS Protection up to 10 gbit/s and 4 mpps, which proves to be very effective against most types of DDoS attacks. Solar Communications GmbH data center has a complex security system, which corresponds to the toughest of the modern security standards. Zeropid.com No No No Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Zeropid.com accepts bitcoin as payment method for world class web hosting services inlcuding Linux/Windows VPS servers, fully managed cPanel dedicated servers and domain name registrations. Invoice is generated at checkout automatically. HostingBuY No No No No Yes Yes Yes Yes No No Yes HostingBuY A small but stable and strong in his last few years we have worked for others and provide quality services. Success is based on the philosophy of combining excellent quality product at affordable price points with a first-class network, together with a highly skilled engineering and technical support team. Hosts in multiple data centers in Europe (Amsterdam, Frankfurt, Brussels) and the US (Manassas). We are always there to meet every client, we provide the support of the maximum, do us a bit that the client is satisfied. Bitcoin payment is made using BitPay and the invoice is generated at checkout. CrookServers.com No No No Yes Yes No Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes CrookServers offers premium managed/unmanaged Dedicated Servers w/ DDos Protection, VPS's and Domain registrations. Bitcoin payment is made using BitPay and the invoice is generated at checkout. AJKservers No No Yes Yes Yes No Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes AJKservers provides premium Linux Xen/SSD VPS, Windows VPS and Europe/USA Dedicated Servers. Bitcoin payment is made using BitPay and the invoice is generated at checkout. Server&Cloud No No Yes No Yes No No No Yes Yes Yes Server & Cloud is a Swiss company established in the global market of hosting services. Top notch equipment and reliable service guarantee 100% security of the data stored in our DC. We offer small, big and large scale businesses modern services which are in a heavy demand nowadays: Dedicated Servers, Cloud Hosting, DDoS Protection and Colocation. TortoiseLabs Yes No Yes No Yes No No No Yes Yes No TortoiseLabs offers physical and virtual infrastructure on demand. Bitcoin payment is made using an invoice-specific payment address. Only a username and e-mail address are required to sign up. SnelServer Yes No No No Yes No No No ? ? ? TOS does not mention proxies BitVPS No Yes Yes Yes Yes No No No ? No ? Plans start from $15 quarterly AllGamer, LLC Yes No No Yes Yes No No No ? ? ? Choose BitPay as payment method. Host1.no Yes No Yes No Yes Yes Yes Yes No No Yes Host1.no offers VPS, Dedicated Servers, VPN, Web Hosting, Domain registration, SSL and managed hosting. Offers Bitcoin payment through Bitpay. Synalabs Hosting Yes No Yes No Yes Yes Yes Yes ? ? ? See listing also at Virtual private server WhatTheServer.me No Yes No No No Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes ? WhatTheServer.me offers offshore unmanaged VPS's, Domains, SSL certificates, and Logless OpenVPN Tunnels. Bitcoin payment is made using BitPay/okpay/coinbase. OrangeWebsite.com - Iceland No Yes Yes No Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes ? OrangeWebsite.com has been offering offshore professional server solutions since 2009. Now all services are available for purchase by Bitcoin. Sign up and use our services completely anonymously! BuildYourVPS Yes No No Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Market prices in BTC for Virtual and Dedicated servers. Low cost unmanaged servers for less than $2/month in BTC. Multihomed 99.99% uptime from Portland Oregon. Dual-stack IPv4/IPv6 since 2009. Services by TOCICI Fork Networking No No No Yes Yes No No No Yes Yes ? Fork Networking has been providing Dedicated Servers, VPS, and Colocation in the USA since 1993. Proven 99.998% Uptime. Accepting Bitcoin for all services. TrilightZone No Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes ? TrilightZone.org has been offering Privacy Services since 2005, Offshore Dedicated Servers, VPS, Cloud Solutions, Hosting, Backup, Administration and more. Web World Ireland No No Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes ? Web World Ireland is a leading hosting provider in Europe, we offer custom build dedicated servers to your specification. We also offer managed hosting services. SuperSeedbox.co.uk No No No No Yes No No No Yes Yes ? SuperSeedbox.co.uk offers 100Mb/s - 1Gb/s unmetered, shared and dedicated seedboxes & servers. Incloudibly.com No No Yes No Yes Yes No No Yes Yes ? Incloudibly.com is a Swiss web hosting company that focuses on DDoS Protected Solutions. Incloudibly offers DDoS protected Dedicated Servers, Cloud VPS, Colocation, Game Server hosting and professional DDoS protection from all types of web-based attacks with highest security protected by Swiss Federal Act on Data Protection. DATACLUB.BIZ No Yes No Yes Yes No No No Yes Yes ? DataClub.biz is a Hosting Company and an Offshore Company which is owned by DataClub S.A. VirtualVM No No No Yes No No No No No No ? VirtualVM offers 4x Static IP Virtual Servers for $3.99/mo. USA Based. Exclusively accepts Bitcoin. VertVPS.com No Yes No Yes No No No No No No ? VertVPS.com offers KVM, OpenVZ VPS Hosting at affordable prices. Dewlance.com No No Yes No No Yes Yes No No No ? Dewlance.com Provide Windows VPS at 0.90 BTC, Domain Registration, RDP Account and Hosting Services. Yoku Cloud Hosting No Yes No No No No Yes Yes Yes Yes ? Hyper-V Based, Windows or Linux Virtual Servers, Cloud Servers, New York City USA location, Prices Start at $20 per server, dedicated ip blocks, bitcoin ok. L3server No No No Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes No ? Dedicated Servers in Europe (Germany) and USA, VPS servers, and even entire racks. In business since over 10 years. Also offering special security hardening, cPanel Master Reselling, Domain Registrations, and SSL Certificates. Bitcoin accepted. Optical Cube Web Hosting, VPS and IT consulting No Yes No No No No No No No No ? Cloudrck Technologies No Yes No Yes No Yes No No No Yes Yes Cloudrck Tech provides unmetered VPS, and custom application hosting solutions. Bitcoin accepted for all services! Servers in North Carolina, USA Front Range Hosting No Yes No Yes No Yes Yes Yes No ? Yes Provider of cloud hosting (KVM & OpenVZ), domain registration, SSL certificates, Anycast DNS, and CDN. Dedicated Minds Yes No No No Yes No No No No Yes ? Locations in GA (US), TX (US). Custom build options available. Zionvps Yes No No Yes No No No No ? Yes Yes Ddos-protected premium vps hosting. By default comes with minimum unmetered 100mbps port. You can choose for higher speed but maximum data will be limited. Complete reactive managed and cpanel comes as addons. We have custom plans ready if you want! Simple-webhosting.eu Yes No No Yes No Yes Yes No No Yes No A simple one-plan host based in Amsterdam, that offers combined VPS/Web hosting, starting from €1.48 (no root access, only IPv6) and €6,48 (with root access and IPv4 address). Domain Name and DNS Hosting IT Itch Privacy protected domain names with bitcoin payment by default. Anonymous domain name registration allowed. DNS hosting with advanced features like DNSSEC. SuperBitHost.com Get the cheapest domains that you can buy with bitcoin! COM domain for $10.99/y with FREE privacy WHOIS protection, and many more TLDs for reasonable prices. Hosterbox.com Hosterbox is now accepting Bitcoins simply place your order and pay with Bitcoin at checkout, pay for Domain registrations, Web hosting, VPS's, Dedicated servers and Reseller hosting with Bitcoin. Bitcoin payment is made using BitPay and the invoice is generated at checkout. BitcoinWebHosting.net Choose from dozens of TLDs! Get your .com for only $11.95/yr, with FREE privacy/WHOIS protection. Order our Business shared hosting account or a dedicated server and get a FREE SSL. QHoster.com Over 100 domain name TLDs available. All domain names are registered instantly so you do not need to wait. Bitcoin payments are automated via BitPay. HostingBuY For through a few simple steps, register your domain, and then select one of the listed DNS Templates To make applying DNS changes easier, you can choose from the following DNS templates for popular configurations. Like Google Apps, Blogger, WordPress.com and many other.Bitcoin payment is made using BitPay and the invoice is generated at checkout. WhatTheServer.me offers offshore unmanaged VPS's, Domains, SSL certificates, and Logless OpenVPN Tunnels. Bitcoin payment is made using BitPay/okpay/coinbase and has automatic deployment upon receipt of payment. Our domain pricing is excellent and doesn't rape your wallet like the competition does just cause its available via bitcoins :) .... Most tld include free whois privacy protect and dns management inside our client area along with email forwarding etc. NerdyChild.com NerdyChild have extremely cheap domain name registrations for over 40 TLDs and include WHOIS privacy for free. Domains start at $4.99. Payments are accepted instantly (0 confirmations). They also have cheap web, VPS and email hosting. TrilightZone Providing Privacy Services Since 2005, Including Offshore Domain plus DNS, Choose from Multiple Offshore Jurisdictions LovingDomains Bitcoin Domain :: Register domain name, buy domain name pay with Bitcoin Web World Ireland We specialize in registering European country level domains at affordable prices. All our domains come with a full DNS control panel. Namecheap namecheap rated one of the best registrars now accepts bitcoins and give free whoisguard! NameSilo ICANN-accredited registrar accepting Bitcoin and offering completely free WHOIS Privacy for all domains at all times, 2FA and an easy API. MonsterMegs - Domain Registration, Domain Privacy, Email Forwarding, DNS Management, and SSL Certificates all payable with Bitcoin anonymously. FAT Inc. - Anonymous domain registrations and certificates payable by bitocin. Since 1996. Dewlance.com - Cheap Domain Registration, Free Domain Privacy, Email Forwarding, DNS Management and starting price is 0.65 BTC and less. Exoware.net Exoware will accept Bitcoin payments for domain registrations providing that orders are not attempted to be made anonymously with fake details. Prices are in GBP (British pounds) and will be converted at payment-time to BTC according to current rates. Domain identity protection and managed DNS available. cPanel-Host Domain Registration - register over 60 top level domains (TLD), such as .com, .net, .pro, .eu, .de, .nl, .pl, .co, .in, .kr.com, .es, ... Domains4Bitcoins.com, Free Privacy Protection, DNS, Domain Forwarding, Mail Forwarding, & Domain Theft Protection! BitDomain.BIZ, anonymous domain registration with Bitcoin. Wide range of toplevel domains. Free privacy WHOIS protection and much more... barwen.ch (info), no-frills tiny shell accounts and secondary DNS for 0.025 BTC per month (for full shell, first payment must be by PayPal, but for DNS, bitcoin only is fine) BitaTel Cheap domains, Email and Webhosting; privacy protection, DNS hosting Web and Email forwarding available. Domains are set up instantly after payment with 0 confirmations needed Cinfu Hosting Solutions Cheap Web Hosting and VPS Servers with unmetered data transfer (based in Germany), Domains registration. Microtronix Hosting, Domain Names, Hosting and VPS servers at incredible prices OrangeWebsite.com, anonymous domain registration service. We offer free private WHOIS. Also .is domains! Bitronic Technologies, At Bitronic Technologies you can buy domain names with Bitcoin as well as hosting and SSL Certificates. Domain names start at only 1 BTC and hosting from .275 BTC Monthly. Frank Domains, Pay with Bitcoin (and other coins for domain names, all top level domains and 200 European/Global TLDs plus you can pay for every new gTLD that launches (like .guru) with Bitcoin, including Landrush phases and premium domains NameTerrific, NameTerrific provides an entirely new experience to register and manage your domain names, with unique features such as Cloud-based DNS and developer-friendly APIs. Accepting Bitcoin payments at discounted rates. KalyHost, domain names, web hosting, VPS Synalabs Hosting Linux sysadmins, cPanel Webhosting, Xen VPSs, Domain names and SSL certificates, all EU based. CINIPAC Hosting Domain registration and offshore hosting in Romania, Netherlands, and various other countries. Domains include free WHOIS protection, anonymous registration. Phurix Reliable UK based web hosting and domain names for bitcoins. BTCHosting.to Anonymous Domain registration, offshore hosting in 7 differnet countries (Iceland, Netherlands, ...) and more. AnonymousBitcoinDomains.com 100% anonymous domain registration. Simply because no email address or other personal data from you is needed. It's time to make it normal again to be an anonymous consumer and not having each aspect of you getting tracked and traced. Email TrilightZone Providing Privacy Services Since 2005 - Including Offshore Secure Email - Choose from Multiple Offshore Jurisdictions ! NerdyChild.com NerdyChild have extremely cheap email hosting (from $0.99). Payments are accepted instantly (0 confirmations). They also have domain name registration and web hosting. BitMail.BIZ E-Mail Hosting, Anonymous and spam-free e-mail hosting. Unlimited e-mails, anonymous registration, secure and anonymous payment with Bitcoin. Bizzapp Google Apps for Business. Everything you need to keep your business connected. Bitcoin accepted. BitPiggy Platform Hosted email delivery (outgoing SMTP relay), suitable for web developers building websites or other Internet services. 250 emails/day or 3000 email/month free! Extra services paid with bitcoin. Elite Email Award winning email marketing solution to create eye-catching emails, manage your mailing list and track your results with comprehensive reports. Microtronix Hosting, Groupware email hosting, group and personal calendar's and addressbook's. Complete with webmail, Pop3, Imap and SMTP. TrashMail.net - Disposable email addresses Create disposable email addresses to protect against spam & newsletters. Advanced features can be enabled by by paying with bitcoin. Anonymous Speech (aka Vistomail) Professional anonimity provider for secure anonymous email. Anonymous Domain and Hosting Offshore, Anonymous Surfing, SSL, Time Delayed, Bulk Email and many more functions. xcapsa.com Improve your digital privacy with your own private and secure email, file storage/sync, contacts, and calendar server. Encrypted storage. Secure SMTP, IMAP, CardDav, CalDav available to securely connect phones, tablets, etc. RuggedInbox.com Free offshore email, ad-free, 100% open source, TOR friendly, no personal details needed, no question asked, session expiration friendly (10 hours), limited number of accounts available VoIP/SMS TeleCallMart.com Local and Toll Free Numbers in 60+ countries from 1$, Voip calls, SIP Phone, Auto Attendant, DTMF. No monthly fees and 0$ setup. Arrowtel Hosted PBX and VoIP service for your organization. Based in Los Angeles, CA. No contracts required! www.vpn3000.com VoIP SIP/IAX2 use your own device, free calls between customers, now with shopping cart supporting bitcoins to buy credit directly in bitcoins, no monthly fees, webcallback, support sipbroker dids for incoming calls. BitTarget Easy-to-use worldwide SMS API, premium service with incredible prices. Mumble4Bitcoin VoIP Mumble-Server for Gaming, private chat-room etc. high security and outstanding speech quality (free test-server) Lightbox Technologies, VOIP phone service SIP/IAX2 – residential and business. Proudly Canadian Morrotel, Residential and wholesale VoIP provider with automated bitcoin payment gateway. Based in Spain, cheap termination rates, DID numbers. smsZ.net, send SMS messages worldwide (0.5 btc/sms) txt4coins.net, anonymous pay-per-use worldwide SMS, incl. API access & bulk messages. No registration! teamspeak 4 free, teamspeak voip servers. www.btcvoip.com sip trunks, iax2 trunks,callback client for android, fully automated payment in bitcoins, billing by the second, account created in real time. resellers wanted 20% profit over sales. www.swilliamtell.com VoIP termination provider, very cheap rates, automatic bitcoin payments Forward-phone-number Get a phone number in 40+ countries. Forward calls received by this number to your mobile or landline. Limesco Dutch mobile telecom operator with advanced technical possibilities for consumers. Security Services SuperBitHost.com offers immediate safe & secure setup upon order completion with free technical assistance DDos protection up to 6 gbit/s ATTACK BANDWIDTH + Incoming SMTP protection. Or you can grab a ready DDos protected dedicated server. BitcoinWebHosting.net DDoS Protection up to 500+ GBPS and Malware Removal and Cleanup services available. TrilightZone Providing Privacy Services Since 2005 - Including Security Services Vanda Security, Information security consulting firm providing web application, and network security; penetration testing; security compliance; policy; and enterprise security programs. Bin Security, Web application security testing and security advice. WP Secu, WordPress security testing: webapp testing of whole sites, source code testing of plugins and themes. Have nine years of experience with information security. Online Network Security Lessons, Small group and private lessons, ever wanted to crack a WEP/WPA/WPA2 key? Learn this and more today! Anonymous online network security lessons via IRC. BTC Only! Away RJN Cryptography, If you have pictures, files or data that are for your eyes only, use the best and fastest encryption available. onionkrack, (onion site) Accelerated hash recovery - most popular hash formats, WPA. BTC only. tor2web link JonDonym Anonymisation Service You can buy premium services with Bitcoins. FNOP Secure Phone, Customized Linux-based Secure Phones for secure voice and text communication, also includes a Bitcoin wallet and a simple web browser with Tor (soon to be anounced a lite version that will serve as a highly secure bitcoin wallet). EVALinux We do security testing for networks, servers and applications. We give you reports and offer repair/patching services. UNIQPASS Large password list for use in penetration testing and security audit. Mobile App Development Subsume Technologies, Inc. iOS and Mac developer with over 15 years experience. Bitcoins valued at 10% greater than exchange rates. FarmGeek Ltd - You reap what we code FarmGeek Ltd: Professional web and app development in the UK. We can bring your ideas to life. We provide quality android development. Contact us for a quote and make sure to mention bitcoin! 10% discount for ? paying clients! Rocketmade - A web, iOS and Android development shop specializing in building apps for startups based in USA. We are very well versed in Bitcoin. We offer a 5-15% discount to clients who pay in Bitcoin. We are open to equity projects depending on the client, the idea, etc. Productivity Online Domain Tools Server Monitoring Online tool for monitoring your websites and servers - downtime, response time, etc. 10 % discount with ODT-10-OFF-BTC coupon for all Bitcoin payments on Online Domain Tools. Roll Your Tasks (RYT) A free browser based task management app for individuals and small groups. Bitcoin donations welcome. Other BitcoinForFlowers.com flower ordering service 2Bitcoin offers bitcoin-related domain-names for sale. bitcoinwinkel.nl Send (and receive!) SMS message ("texting") to Dutch mobile phones and gamble Bitcoin Egypt Bitcoin services in Egypt. Currently sells refill codes for pay-as-you-go mobile phones. Woboq Quassel Hosting Offers hosting for Quassel IRC cores, the distributed IRC client (similar to an IRC BNC) FoxyCart A hosted e-commerce platform built for integration into existing systems. CashCtrl Intuitive and efficient online accounting software. Favicon b4c.jpg bit4coin.net (info) Bitcoin gift voucher - buy online and redeem for bitcoin at bit4coin.net Online products Search Engines Search Engine and Aggregator, A search engine and content aggregator for bitcoin related sites Globalogiq HTML Code Search, This search engine allows searching within HTML source code and HTTP headers across the web. Cloud Providers and Services BitcoinWebHosting.net offers VPS in 6 different worldwide locations and dedicated servers in the U.S. and Amsterdam. Choose your OS, configure how you like, deploy your server quickly. VPS servers are activated within 15 minutes. 99.99% Uptime. No Bullshit SLA. RemoteFS Geo-distributed highly redundant online storage for backups and archival TrilightZone Providing Privacy Services Since 2005 - Including Offshore Cloud Services - Choose from Multiple Offshore Jurisdictions ! wiki-site.com Wiki hosting s3rsync.com On line rsync backup to Amazon S3 storage Yoku Cloud Hosting Private Cloud Servers running Windows or Linux with full remote desktop or ssh access. GbVault, Online Data Backup: Fast - Safe - Secure Sublight, Sublight is application for searching and downloading movie subtitles. Away RJN Cryptography, Before you "cloud" your files, securely encrypt them. EVALinx Free and Open Source Software consulting. We speak Spanish/English. We specialize in: Virtualization (private and public), LAMP, Networking, Security, Backup and Encryption. We offer personalized hosting solutions as well. Dawnplay.com Gaming Servers. Hourly hosting, no slot restrictions, global locations, automated setup, SSH/FTP. From $0.06 per hour. Software OSHI Defender The OSHI Defender is fast and light anti-malware application, which incorporates powerful Cloud AV. Subscription can be purchased using Bitcoin. MyGunDB.com The #1 firearm inventory software for collectors. The Free version can be upgraded to the Full version using BitCoin. ScientificSun.com Free software for encrypting files into bitmap images. Accounts can be upgraded using bitcoin. GenoPro.com Genealogy software for drawing family tree. 20% off if by with Bitcoin. DeadMansSwitch.net A digital last will and testament service, perfect for sending your loved ones instructions on how to unlock your bitcoin stash. MyBTC-Trader.com, a MtGox Bitcoin trading client for windows with GUI. DRIPS Debt Reduction and Investment Planning Software. SubDownloader Crossplatform software to automagically download subtitles for movies/episodes. ThinlineData CRM Custom Made CRM solution. darkFunction Editor 2D Sprite/animation editor for game developers NoTex A (browser based) reStructuredText editor with PDF, HTML & LaTex export Scry Anti-Theft Tracks your stolen laptop, protects your identity and keeps your data safe. Bloom Editor Text Editor in 3D with special effects for creative writing. SherrodComputers.com File Renamer Deluxe and other small windows utilities CashCtrl Intuitive and efficient online accounting software. InterApp'ed™ - Proud Canadian-based organization providing custom websites and software development for client/server, desktop, mobile and web based applications. BitMate Bitcoin Plugins & Payment Solutions for WordPress Smart-It Smart-It accounting software with POS,advanced stock control and workshop module from South Africa. Rainlendar Multiplatform desktop calendar. Servolutions Tools for Microsoft Outlook and Exchange. Godot & Co. TimeTraveller software - automatically switches time zone on your windows PC when you travel. Coding Robots Journalling and video diary software for Mac. Education-related Software Hackers Handbook, Step-by-step hacking tutorials and mobile apps for Android, Windows Phone, and iPhone(Cydia) Language101.com, Language learning for Spanish, French, Italian, German, Russian and more! 10% discount when using BTC. Mosg Teacher, program for learners of Russian. Mirrors:mosg.onlinewebshop.net,mosg.cuccfree.com Question Writer, desktop software for making quizzes and tests. Ask for 5% discount if paying by BTC. Qiqqa, research management software for reading, exploring and tagging your massive library of PDFs. 40% discount when paying in BTC (2BTC vs. $35). Gambling mBitCasino.com a 24/7 Live Dealer Casino that allows you to gamble with real people in real time. In addition there are over 130 games to choose from. BitcoinGamblingSites.com The Best Bitcoin Gambling Review Site - Covers Poker, Blackjack, Sportsbooks, Casinos and More. Industry Leader - Read Reviews and Find the Best Site to Gamble on. BitBandit.eu Istant play, no registration, slot machine where you can win up to 5000 times your bet or make money with the affiliate program. Provably fair and transparent! BlimpBet.com Professional soccer betting. Clear website with many sophisticated features. No registration. Transparent and fair. AnoniBet Online Sports Betting with BitCoins. Bitango Play the game - Live the dream. Lottery with no limits. Winner selected every Friday night UTC. BitBet is an exciting way to play for Bitcoins. Our microlotteries finish in just minutes.. ApopheniaBTC Win BTC by betting and guessing correctly what the pictures show. Cheap Betting Tips Professional soccer predictions to use in your bets. 7 wins out of 10 bets guaranteed, BTC accepted for subscriptions. Backcoin Betting with no registration. Starcraft2 and other games. betbybitcoin You can open your bets anonymously, Get big fees. Bets of Bitcoin Prediction game for real world events. Bit777 Casino Bit777 Casino is the Bitcoin industry's leading full-service casino. It features a full list of online casino games, such as American, European, French, No Zero and Card Roulettes; Standard Blackjack, as well as Surrender, Switch, Exposure, Pontoon, Spanish and SnapJack; Table games such as Craps, Caribbean Stud, Let Em Ride, 3 Card Poker, Pai Gow and others; Popular Video Poker games; a set of Slot machines and Scratch Cards. BitBears Buy, Share, Profit. A bitcoin chain game that gives 1.1x payout and 97% odds. BitBet.us Most active Bitcoin predictions site, no registration required Bitcoin Minefield is a simple game of luck. You can win up to 22.5x your bet in BTC! Good luck and have fun! Bitcoin Darts Play darts and win Bitcoins! Bitcoin Gem The Marvelous Bitcoin Gem! The original and most popular Bitcoin chain game. Bitcoin Pyramid is a pyramid HYIP (kind of a game of luck). (Rules may change, money can be lost. Use at your own risk!) BitLotto Monthly and Weekly raffle/lottery games. BitLucky Genuine online lottery. Great way to multiply your bitcoins : Secure, mobile friendly, anonymous. Bitino.com. Hi/Lo Card Game. Win Bitcoins. Beautifully Designed. Quick Withdrawals. Provably Fair. bitramid bitcoin pyramid scheme. BitTrivia Trivia questions for Bitcoin. Bit Madness Free NCAA Basketball March Madness Pool Manager, with (or without) bitcoins. BitsPoker Play Poker using Bitcoin or for free. Very low rake. Affiliate Program. Bitvegas(info) BitVegas is the first provably fair casino built 100% into Minecraft. Features Roulette, Blackjack, Minefield and Pig Races. BlockBet.net Bet and win online with Bitcoins on popular sports events including NBA, NFL, NHL, KHL and European football leagues. BTCbet.co Bitcoin Betting Exchange. Bet with bitcoin on a range of sports and markets. No registration required. Btc-Go Collect bets into single pot and win at all! The more you bet the more is the chance to win! Significant pots as more people play! btc-lotto Bet on the official results of the German 6/49 Saturday Lottery. Bitcoin Lottery A bitcoin gambling resource where chances to win vary between 98% and 1%. BTCOracle Predict and bet on the future price of bitcoin | Anonymous, fast, instant play | The leading binary option exchange in bitcoin ! Bitcoin 4 Reel browser-based (HTML5/JS) easy to use Slot Machine with four reels that allows you to play for real or for fun. Prices can be as high as 50 BTC. Bitcoin Video Casino Play casino games with Bitcoins. No registration needed, instant deposits, provably fair, progressive jackpots, 99.5% expected return. Video poker, roulette, blackjack. bitZino HTML5 Bitcoin Casino. Featuring Blackjack, Video Poker, Roulette, Craps, and Slots. Provably fair. 0-confirmation deposits. Wide range of limits: wager as low as 1 uBTC, and as high as 100 BTC (max limit varies by game). btcgriffin/BitcoinLottery/BitcoinGame One out of seven players wins the game!! Prize is 5 times his/her bet. btcLottery Weekly BitCoin Pick-3 Lottery. Recently went through a complete overhaul. btcsoccer Loginless betting on soccer matches. CashClamber, FREE no deposit streaker game with prizes every 30 minutes. HTML5 Social Gaming. Play for fun. Play for bitcoin. Players compete head-2-head in a series of mini games. Climb to the top of the pyramid to win the jackpot! Try out our skill based games head to head for fun or bitcoin, you can really win here. Enjoy our social features including newsfeeds, instant messaging, voice and video chat, friends, winners. Good anonymous fun! Give it a go, what you got to lose? A mouse click. *** Warning! *** It's addictive! The more you play the more chance of winning. Want a FREE end of game advert for bitcoin orientated sites? No problem simply follow the link. Find out more About Us on our user page. Free Bitcoin Casino Min bet starts from 0.0001BTC, fast withdrawals. Roulette, BlackJack and Slots CasinoBit is widely considered the first mainstream Bitcoin casino established, it is also the first Bitcoin casino to offer live Roulette and they have incorporated the traditional casino model into the Bitcoin economy in an exceptionally skilled manner rendering the play engaging. Currently only live Roulette is available but the owners have voiced their willingness to add live Horse Racing, live Punto Banco, live Poker and live Blackjack. Cloudbet Sportsbook and live dealer casino. 5 BTC signup bonus, instant withdrawals. CoinBaller A simple player vs player bitcoin gambling game CoinFount is an extremely simple game of skill and strategy. The strategic challenge is to be the one to push the pot to the threshold of .11 BTC. CoinGames Classic online betting games. No registration or personal info required. DailyBTC A bitcoin lottery that pays out every single day and also has a FREE scratch-off game. Double or Nothing Coin flipping game with cryptographic proof of fair play. Europcoin.com Try doubling your bet at Europcoin.com! No registration required. Very small bets only. FunnyBTC.com is the best Roulette to make bitcoins. American double zerro and European roulette are available. Simple interface. No registration. No additional downloads. Provably fair. Fast withdrawals. Gold Game Land Instant pay mini casino with no registration required Just-Dice.com 1% House Edge Dice Game. Win over 100 BTC per roll. Choose your odds and "hi or lo". On-site investment opportunity (Be the House). Lively on-site chat. Live-ruletka Live-ruletka is the best online casino with the unique roulette, amazing 3D games, card games and live game. Every day Live-ruletka holds free roulette tournaments where winners get real money. NakaBot (Tor hidden service) NakaBot is a Bitcoin game of chance offering a break-even percentage of over 98.74%, and a progressive jackpot. Peerbet The first online gambling platform without a negative expected value! Provably fair. PLAYTIN - The Bitcoin Casino PLAYTIN is The HTML5 Bitcoin Casino. Games include Easy Hold'em Poker, Video Poker, Keno, Let It Ride, Red Dog, Red and Blue, Roulette. All games are provably fair. Instant deposits (0-confirmation) and very fast withdraws. Predictious the Premier Bitcoin Prediction market. You can trade predictions on Sport, Movies, TV, Politics, Bitcoin Economy, etc. and if you are right, win Bitcoins. PrimeDice.com Lowest House Edge (1%) | Instant Betting | No Delays | Choose your own odds Satoshi-Karoshi | 1.5% house edge, provably fair. Choose your grid size, then walk through the minefield by clicking a square in the highlighted row. Make a safe choice, and Bitcoins are yours. Claim them or choose a square from the next row for an even bigger payout. Step on a mine, and it's KABOOM! Satoshi36 Perfectly fair bitcoin lottery. Instant deposit and withdrawal, no registration. SatoshiBet Bitcoin Casino featuring Bitcoin Roulette, Bitcoin Blackjack, Bitcoin Slot Machine, Casino War. No registration required. SatoshiCircle.com SatoshiCircle is an interactive casino style wheel game with better odds than roulette. It features multiple circles, Penguins, Balloons, Rocket ships, UFOs & Aliens, Awards, a Leaderboard, a Rewards and Affiliate Program and a monthly contest draw for Bitcoins. SatoshiDICE.com The world's most popular Bitcoin game - win up to 64,000x your bet. Seals With Clubs Texas Hold'em Poker. Starcraft Bitcoin Open Automated Starcraft 2 tournaments for Bitcoin prize pools. StrikeSapphire : The first complete Bitcoin casino! Slots, Roulette, Poker, Craps, Blackjack and original games, with more added all the time. Original browser based software, and all-multiplayer action. No bets allowed from the US. Syndiquick Lottery syndicate website that accepts Bitcoins. Allows users to play lottery draws from around the world. The Lucky Coin Casino is a gambling site with blackjack and video poker. No registration required. Torfl Bitcoin Raffle and Bonus Draw. Winvery Flash Casino & Poker featuring dozens of games accepting Bitcoins for deposits and withdrawals. Vera&John Vera&John is the first licensend and regulated online casino to support deposits and withdrawals in Bitcoin. Offering games from NetEnt, Play'n GO, Betsoft, IGT, Nextgen Gaming, Bally Technologies. ZingPoker.com - A bitcoin video poker. Jacks or Better. Instant play, no registration. Touchscreen friendly. Games Best Bitcoin Game you can find here a lot of Free Games for bitcoins 3D Virtual Tabletop For roleplaying games, wargaming, and other tabletop games. Board Game Arena Play board games online! Coinfell SteamBitShop Buy Steam games with bitcoin - Automatic delivery of most games, no sign-up required ApopheniaBTC Win BTC by guessing correctly what the pictures show. Exalted Items Equipment and currency items for Path of Exile. Ultimacodes.com Selling UO Gold, Artifacts, Resources, Powerscrolls and Tokens for Ultima Online (First MMORPG). Bitcoin2CDKey.com Buy Game cd keys with bitcoins, battlefield 3, mw3, mass effect 3, counter strike go, dota 2, max payne, Fifa 12, steam keys, origin keys, gfwl games, and more! Lost Labyrinth Old-School Coffee-Break Dungeon-Crawling Game Bitcoin Darts is a simple darts game played with bitcoins. iWantFreeBitCoins pays you BTC for completing offers (including surveys, facebook games, iphone games, android games etc.). Dragon's Tale is an MMORPG filled with novel games in a 3D environment. Free Bitcoins to get started, or bring your own. Native clients for Windows, OSX, Linux. nestorgames is an independent publisher of portable board games. More than 60 titles in its catalogue. Puzzle Moppet a block shifting 3D puzzle game (bitcoin purchase page) Second Life via VirWoX Buy Linden Dollars for Bitcoins at VirWoX and choose from over 1 million virtual items to buy for your Second Life avatar! Time Warp interactive, is a fiction/nonfiction mmorpg that is in alpha and is selling the game only through bitcoins Island Forge Player-Created Content MMORPG The Bit Mines is an online multiplayer gaming experience built on the Minecraft engine. Includes leader boards, bitcoin integration, and payouts for mining and building! RPG MO is an indie style massively multiplayer online role-playing game where you can buy in-game credits with bitcoins. MineThings Browser-based MMORPG. A slow-paced, real-time game that rewards patience and planning. Humble Bundle Pay-what-you-want video game sales. Direct download and Steam keys provided. qdoop.net (Demo) A simple bitcoin game to completely based on block chain. virtualminergame.com A virtual cryptocurrencies game where you can buy virtual cryptocurrencies, virtual mining rigs, or even virtual ASICs. draglet Bitcoin bootcamp Bitcoin exchange game with a realistic environment, allows everyone to learn bitcoin daytrading. Also has a prize distribution of real Bitcoin to top participants. Griddlers.net Online logic puzzle games. PDF books and subscription for cryptocurrencies. Graphic design Vector Toons – Royalty free vector graphics (including vector bitcoins) BTC accepted. Plop Plot – graphic solutions for Bitcoins Ann Jones Digital - Graphic Design Creating stunning visual communication combining images, words and ideas to convey information for all types of media Liira Media - Web Marketing A full service web marketing agency specializing in website design and development, search engine optimization, social media management, pay-per-click campaign management, and brand/reputation management. All of our work is responsive to all mobile devices, standard. Contact us today for a free quote File sharing MEGA File sharing and encrypted online storage Bitvoucher.co Official Mega reseller. Starting at 1 TB/month. Save 17% here. BitCoinTorrentz.com - Remote torrent downloading service VODO, P2P film distributor BitcoinService.co.uk (info), filesharing site Premiumize.me - Combined premium access to 18 sharehoster. Local websites via proxy. Free seven days trial. SmartFTP FTP/SFTP Client Boosterking File Hosting Boosterking file hosting is a hosting site for fast download NZBMatrix - NZB Index site, Accepts Bitcoin for VIP subscriptions. DTSLeech.com - Inexpensive, secure, feature rich shared and dedicated seedbox solutions starting at $11USD/mo. SuperSeedbox.co.uk - High speed, 100% anonymous torrent seedboxes and servers. Filenium.com - Premium accounts at file sharing and storage sites bitfetch download your torrents anonymously in your browser for bitcoin Music Doujindance - J-Core music webstore Digital-Tunes - Legal digital downloads of Drum & Bass, Dubstep, Bass Music & other electronic music, in WAV, FLAC and MP3 formats DJ Leo - Music about Bitcoin available for free for the Bitcoin community Blocknois.es - Bitcoin music label dedicated to bringing more artists to the Bitcoin world Pathmusick - Bitcoin donations accepted for FLAC files for a number of albums and artists. Tik Tok Laboratories Turbo-grandpa-folk; Anachronistic futures speculation; Accepts Bitcoin for digital album downloads through in-house client. Loja de Música Online PM AKORDEON Record Label Accepts Bitcoin for track downloads. (Invoices in EUR) ThriceFoldedCloak original productions :: Acid // Downbeat // Drum and Bass :: Free downloads, optional payment. Bitcoin address on soundcloud page. Education of the Noobz Lossless downloads of lo-tech Homecomputer music and mixed live recordings from Dragan Espenschied, member of Bodenständig 2000. ASCII shopping cart interface. Video Seconds Digital concerts and tracks download. Also accepting donations for some free downloads. Dependent on artist contracts. bzwahr.mine.nu/music Optional bitcoin donations. skin contact Accepts bitcoin payments for album download. The Symphony of Science is a musical project headed by John Boswell. Accepts bitcoin donations for music downloads. RPG Beats Accepts bitcoin payment for hip-hop beat leases. Apeiron Restraint Anti-facist, pro-reason metal band accepting bitcoin donations. LOM Non-profit experimental netlabel focused on eastern europe, accepting bitcoin donations. The Kale Rock project of the producer The Kale. Accepts bitcoin payments for track downloads and bitcoin donation. After Hours Jazz Original Jazz, traditional and modern. We have 3 mp3 albums for sale. 1 BTC each. bittracks.com Electronic/instrumental music. Bitcoin exclusive mp3/ogg/flac tracks available for purchase and instant download. paniq, Accepts bitcoin donations for free album downloads. Og Dogg Records - Hip-Hop music site accepting bitcoin payments for mixtapes/songs. Louigi Verona Workshop - Ambient music composer, accepts bitcoin donations. John Edgar Voe Alternative country folk rock from Ireland. Computationally Infeasible Records Virtual, experimental null-profit label accepting bitcoin exclusively. Masguda's Bazaar Work by composer and ethnomusicologist Masguda Shamsutdinova Masala Brass Kollektiv - Austrian alternative Brass and Marchin' Band sells CDs for Bitcoin Virtual Art Matt Goerzen, 3D modeled virtual paintings, accepts BTC in exchange for original .OBJ files. Caricatures online, get your personal digital caricature or order one as an original gift for friends/family! Erik White, Gravitational Art, unique abstract paintings. Hi res images available free. BTC accepted for originals. Digital Downloads Digital Currency Profits A Unique Video Course for Profiting with Bitcoin and CrytoCurrencies Bitvoucher.co Official Mega reseller. Starting at 1 TB/month. WrapBootstrap Themes for Twitter Bootstrap BitBooks.co Self-published authors E-book marketplace CoinDL - A digital downloads marketplace selling Music, eBooks, Photos, and more. Affiliate program enabled. CoinUploads - File storage and sharing for Bitcoin. Store your files securely and privately or share them easily with your friends. No registration needed. btcfile - Sell digital content for bitcoins. No registration. Premiumize.me - Combined premium access to 18 sharehoster. Local websites via proxy. Free seven days trial. StartPython.com - (blank page at DreamHost Feb 10 '14) Assortment of files, accepts bitcoin donations. Evbogue.com - Accepts Bitcoin payments for digital books. HowToTeachEnglishOnline.com - Selling the e-book, How To Teach English Online and Get Money. Will accept 1 bitcoin for this digital download. Yumcoin Sell your digital creations for Bitcoins. Two Scoops Press Selling technical books for the Python Programming Language and the Django Web Framework. Entertainment/Books/Magazines BitBooks.co eBook marketplace: buy books or list your own for sale. ePubMATIC The agency provides you with an excellent know-how aimed to guarantee the realization of perfect ebooks and free use of a platform with which you can easily manage your digital publications. ClassyCams.com Professional cam girl site with dozens of top camgirl models. Bitcoin Weekly A magazine dedicated to all things Bitcoin. Oxcars-2011 Get entry for the fourth edition of the Oxcars, the greatest Free/Libre culture show on earth SomeFunnyPranks.com - Loosen your buckle and have a chuckle. Bitcoin Magazine - Reading into Bitcoin (info), - Bitcoin related magazine available online and in print. Coineer - The Bitcoin Magazine - The World's first Bitcoin magazine available in print. Cam4BTC.com - Lightweight camming site which leverages p2p technology to allow performers to be tipped without fees (in Bitcoins) and to broadcast without registration or restrictions PrudentPrivacy.com - eBook that have many tips and tricks on how you can protect your privacy. Bitcoin only accepted currently; smooth payment with MtGox. The Tax Haven & Global Business Report | www.TheTaxHavenReport.com The Most Valuable, No-BS Advice On Freedom, Asset Protection, Second Passports, Offshore Banking, Company Formation & Retirement Planning. The OFFICIAL site for Grandpa, author of Bye Bye Big Brother the Black Book and W.G. Hill, author of PT "Perpetual Traveler" and dozens other PT books and offshore reports. Bitcoin Step by Step An inexpensive ($3.99) Kindle book that walks the user step by step through how get going in a safe and secure manner. XecNet Ltd UK-Based publisher of books such as Rossi's eCat. Social Media/Aggregators Bitcoin Tribe - An English Language Social Network. Users get 1mBTC for Joining, posting a Bitcoin address and clicking an advertisement at the bottom of the site. Bitcoin Tribe is a place for Bitcoin users to socialize, share ideas and create new paradigms. Cannabis Liberation - USA Based social networking and activism website. Offering points or grams for participation which can then be redeemed for bitcoin and other tangible rewards. PikaPay Logo.pngPikaPay (info) Send bitcoins to Anyone on Twitter Cyber Begging Outrageous Requests - Users tell their story to request money, goods or services. Anyone can visit the website and donate these items. Users encouraged to accept Bitcoins for anonymity. Internet Marketing Accelerated Global - SEO, Social Media and Internet Marketing Website Design We provide professional web services including SEO (search engine optimization), Internet marketing and social media support (Twitter, Facebook, YouTube etc) for your existing website, or we can build you a brand new website to your specifications. We work within any budget acceptable to the client. Bitcoin Is Accepted Here. HitLeap.com - Traffic Exchange - Increases your website hits, rankings and more. Submit your website and receive a large number of visitors. Bitcoin Blogger Supply - Articles and copywriting for the Internet marketer starting at 1 BTC Ann Jones Digital - Internet Marketing Stunning web design, awesome social media marketing, amazing campaigns. Specialties: mobile sites, Joomla & eCommerce. All for just a few bitcoins Liira Media - Web Marketing A full service web marketing agency specializing in website design and development, search engine optimization, social media management, pay-per-click campaign management, and brand/reputation management. All of our work is responsive to all mobile devices, standard. Contact us today for a free quote Mixed Media Marketing Mixed Media Marketing Offer WordPress & Membership Development, Digital Marketing Services, and Mobile Optimisation. Mobile Phone Refill Codes GiftCard BTC Prepaid mobile refill/top up cards, T-Mobile To Go and AT&T GoPhone. Bitcoin-ricarica.com Buy Italian mobile refill/top up cards - Ricariche telefoniche con Bitcoin Material / Physical Products Purchasing Services Coinsfer.com - U.S.-based service which can buy anything online in the U.S. (especially from the many U.S. retailers which require a U.S. shipping address) for Bitcoins and ship it to you anywhere in the world. Liquor/Wines City Wine Cellar - The first licensed online liquor store in the bitcoin economy! Celebrate your bitcoin wealth with champagne! Shipping nationwide in the US! Great selection and the best prices in the web, and special requests can be accommodated. We are specialized in finding rare items, just ask! Exclusive for the bitcoin community: special discounts with the coupon "BtcPromo". Automobiles BitPremier - The first-of-its-kind Bitcoin Luxury Marketplace. Real estate, luxury automobiles, jewelry and watches, home goods, travel and other high-end items. Alternative Energy Andy Schroder sells CPC Evacuated Tube Solar Thermal Collectors, with bitcoin as a payment option. Yeti Solar makes rock-solid reliable solar lighting systems. We are the fastest, easiest solution to getting clean, reliable light in off-grid living spaces like cabins, RVs, boats, camps, and other isolated structures. Or, install it in your home, and never again have to stumble around in the dark during a power outage. Unlike some other 'solar lights' barely worthy of the name, ours are bright enough to read or surf the web by We also make high-efficiency LED lights and lamps you can power the old-fashioned way (plug into the wall). Bitcoin is integrated into our checkout process. Outdoors Wild Blue Sports (info) Outdoor Adventure Gear Superstore - camping, boating, survival gear etc. FireSteel.com FireSteels fire-making gear used by tens of thousands of people including the US Military, hikers, hunters, survivalists, outdoors enthusiasts and bushcrafters the world over. Knives4Bitcoin.com Knives4Bitcoin - Where You Can Trade BTC For Knives! Hunting & Pocket Knives, High Quality Damascus Blades. Get a knife with BTC! TxT Paintball - Paintball markers, gear, and accessories. The first paintball store to accept Bitcoin. Superstores Bitcoinin Consumer electronics, food, beverages, movies, books, and more added daily and upon request Bitcoinblaster.com Consumer electronics, laptops, desktops, tablets, cameras, televisions, and more. New inventory added all the time CoinsForTech Consumer electronics, laptops, tablets, phones, cameras, audio, and more DinoDirect (info) Superstore offering computers, electronics, gadgets, household goods, clothing, gifts, and more. Pay with bitcoins and get free worldwide shipping! Gadgets Direct Over 20,000 Gadgets. Pay with bitcoins and get free worldwide shipping Millenius (info) Consumer electronics, laptops, tablets, phones, cameras, audio Revolutionary Supplies (about): survival gear, storable foods, ecofriendly/organic products, self-defense, personal/home security, tactical gear, etc. We accept Bitcoin and over 40 cryptocurrencies (altcoins). "Independence is freedom and dependence is slavery so be free from fiat!" Säkra Dörren Over 4000 security products such as locks and alarm systems, shipping worldwide Souvenirs from Russia Inexpensive goods from Russia. Shipping worldwide through UPS or FedEx SurplusTraders.net The world's leading WHOLESALE liquidator of factory excess technology parts and equipment Games - Physical JJGames, used video games and consoles (5% discount for Bitcoin purchases) BMIGaming.com Real Arcade Games from BMI Gaming, the "World's Largest Gaming Superstore" offering delivery to over 90 countries worldwide | 100 BTC per order limit - Remaining balance, if any, can be paid using other payment methods (credit card, bank wire, PayPal, etc) NoAgendaCardGame.com NO AGENDA: the Card Game, In the Morning Edition, is a fast-paced, trading card game where players race to be the first to collect a set of No Agenda album art cards. The game deck is customizable from three to eight players. It's family fun for ages 8 and up! (WARNING: autoplay) ModifiedController.com Modified Xbox controllers. Airplane Flight Simulator Sells flight simulator games and add-ons. MemoryEngravers American Sign Language Scrabble. Laser Engraved, reversible ASL Scrabble tiles. Retrotowers Retro video game cables, controllers, clones and flash carts. Chollomedia Electronic products such as micro-sd memories, and game accessories like flash carts. 10%-off discount for Bitcoin payments Coin Oculus Buy Virtual Reality Visor Oculus Rift with Bitcoin Classified Bitcoin Classifieds (info) The first and biggest Bitcoin Classifieds site on the web. The Bitcoin Marketplace Bitcoins classified site and marketplace. Buy and Sell anything with Bitcoins. BitcoinTrading Bitcoin buy/sell classifieds forum with a user feedback system for safe trading of goods and services. BitCoin Jobs A Bitcoin Job board. Post any jobs related to Bitcoin on this board. conBitcoin Free Bitcoin classifieds in Spanish - buy, sell, trade, exchange Deedapp - Online Records for Property Protection - Create Deeds to earn Bitcoin, sell items, and share stuff with others. Eggify - A classifieds web application that lets you buy and sell stuff for bitcoin locally. For Bitcoin (info) Bitcoin Micro Jobs are here to help you earn bitcoins and to help strengthen the bitcoin economy! Miners' Market New marketplace for buyers and vendors who trade in Bitcoins MyBitCommerce BitCommerce listing service free for merchants. Customers can rate and review merchants. 4Bitcoins.com Classifieds (info) Online Bitcoin fleamarket - buy and sell anything for bitcoins OZBTC Buy or sell anything for bitcoins, Australia Jewelry Watch of Essence - High quality male and female watches with an affordable price. Accepting bitcoin and euro payment. Free Shipping World Wide BitPremier - The first-of-its-kind Bitcoin Luxury Marketplace. Real estate, luxury automobiles, jewelry and watches, home goods, travel and other high-end items. Silver.Ag - 140.000 pcs of silver, gold and diamond jewelry physically in stock. Direct producer = best prices. Worldwide free delivery. B2C, B2B (affiliate, dropshipping, wholesale). Total amount can be converted to bitcoins during checkout at actual exchange rate (no fees). Tanzanite - We have an online Tanzanite Gemstone store with the finest quality faceted AAA Tanzanite gemstones available anywhere. There is a wealth of information and a listing of our current inventory on our web site. Mane Antu - Heart and Hand made jewelry. We will never repeat a design, so we don`t need to use any die mold or casting technique. We select the best precious, semi precious stones, and metals, to make of each design a unique piece. We are craftswo/men artists, not resellers. Happy Art Studio - Handmade, colorful and cheerful sterling silver jewelry. I am the artist, not a reseller, so custom orders can be requested via email. I accept Bitcoins at current exchange rates, and provide free shipping worldwide. Live Oak Workshop, Austin TX At Live Oak Workshop we create custom wooden jewelry out of fine quality oak, maple, walnut and other domestic and exotic woods. To use bitcoin just choose "Other" as the payment method and a BTC invoice will be sent to you :-) (its the best Etsy can do but its a start!). E. Christopher and Sons Handmade Sterling silver jewelry - inspired by nature. Jewelry lines include Snowflakes, Tree of Life, Edelweiss, and more. Handmade in our studio in the Kittatinny Mountains of northwestern New Jersey. Rings for Bitcoins Offers tungsten wedding bands and only accepts bitcoin for payment. Mosaika schmuck logo.png Mosaika Schmuck Swiss shop for hand-made jewellery, bracelets, necklaces and earrings. Marketplaces AllSos - Buy and sell goods with BTC/LTC/PPC/LTC. Coingig - The Bitcoin Marketplace - Buy and Sell Products Worldwide For Bitcoin. (offline) The Bitcoin Marketplace - Bitcoins classified site and marketplace. Buy and Sell anything with Bitcoins. (offline) Bitcoin247sales - Bitcoin Marketplace - Sell and Buy goods and services. Cheapest, escrow, digital delivery available. Bitmit Secure Bitcoin market place. Sell and buy goods for Bitcoin. Worldwide! (offline) MokiMarket The ebay/craigslist of Bitcoins! (offline) Bitcoin shopping Shop with your Bitcoins - Worldwide shipping (offline) Coinster Search or add local items (offline) BitCraig, an index of all Bitcoin listings on Craigslist. (offline) BitPremier - The first-of-its-kind Bitcoin Luxury Marketplace. Real estate, luxury automobiles, jewelry and watches, home goods, travel and other high-end items. Merchants Accepting Bitcoin - Free vendor threads and forum for merchants accepting bitcoin. BitPapa - Your online marketplace for buying and selling with Bitcoins! (offline) Corkket - A better local marketplace handling payment and escrow in USD and Bitcoin Auction sites Penny Auctions - Bartering marketplace where users can purchase credits to bid on items, or earn credits by auctioning off goods or services as penny auctions for free. Bitcoin is accepted as payment. Bitmarket (info) Bitmit - BitCoin auction house & shopping portal (English, German, Spanish, French, Italian, Chinese) HASTUschon? (info) A German auction site. BitBid Bitcoin Auction House. Toys, Games and Hobbies BitcoinKeychains.com - Cryptograpically Awesome Keychains and Keyrings BitcoinSushi.com - Novelty keychains from Japan BlackLotusGo.com - Retailer of Magic: the Gathering trading cards. Pays BTC for MTG cards through the buylist. DreamProdigy - =^^= Anime/Manga Figures, Import Toys & Collectibles, Tech Accessories =^^= GoMatkot - Beach Paddles Sports Gear - Matkot, Rackets and accessories GrowersHouse.com - Hydroponics supplies & equipment online super store for grow lights, grow kits, nutrients, and more. Lost + Found Puzzles - Custom wood puzzles perfect for use as wedding guestbooks, kids toys, unique displays, and more. Contact shop owner to customize piece count, add in specific shapes, or any special requests! Million Dollar Bills MillionDollarBills.org - High quality million dollar bills that look, feel and smell real. Pocket Artillery - Miniature REAL Cannons BOOM Pokebit The world's first retailer that sells Pokémon cards and other merchandise, only for Bitcoin TxT Paintball - Paintball markers, gear, and accessories. The first paintball store to accept Bitcoin. Zacatrus! - Boardgames, toys, puzzles and poker stuff Clothing and accessories Clothing for the Jilted Generation Alternative Clothing for the Jilted Generation Bitcoin grunge design available! Apparel for the discerning crypto miner and enthusiast. 51 Attack is the first t-shirt biz to accept 31 different crypto currencies! Bitcoin grunge design available! Apparel for the discerning crypto miner and enthusiast. Zyza Yoga Clothing Zyza creates inspired clothing for modern men and women. StrutChic Women’s Clothing Boutique Bitcoinshirtsdotco.png bitcoinshirts.co High-quality Bitcoin T-shirts. Free shipping to the USA. BitFash Designer brand fashion at competitive prices Bside Logo.png Bside T-shirts, Hoodies, Towels.. Cool Bitcoin Graphics and much, much more. Clinton Charlie Australian designer jeans Noella Jean Jewellery Affordable, yet stunning bracelets, earrings, necklaces and rings. Based in Australia. Btc-trinkets Bitcoin niche items Something Geeky Appealing to the inner geek - geek t-shirts, hoodies, mugs, bags, sweatshirts and more Atomic Threads Retro T-shirts & Hoodies - Retro gaming, film, cars, music and art apparel Patcht Custom clothing that involves you in the design process Bucarelli iPad and macbook leather cases BTC Gear High-quality Bitcoin hats and gunnar Optiks computer glasses Ico6 Geek Shirts & Bitcoin Apparel: Dressing all Einstein's and Beyond. Organic Wardrobe Fashion made from organic, fair trade, and sustainable materials Shoe Web Store Schuhwelt.com - German top brands: Birkenstock, Meindl, Rieker, international shipping, 30 years experience, all languages supported. All Things Luxury Vast selection of luxury jewelry for less. Earrings, necklaces, pandora style beads, simulated diamond engagement rings and much more. Up to 75% off retail plus free shipping on all bitcoin purchases. KinLeaves.com Stylish and protective vinyl wraps for electronic gadgets with free shipping worldwide. Now accepting BTC Alpaca Products for Bitcoins, alpaca socks Siam Secrets Store Handmade Thai Clothing and Products for Bitcoins, "Buy direct from Thailand". Shirtalicious UK A selection of quality T-shirts, free shipping. BitcoinX Gear Configurable Bitcoin Shirts. Spreadshirt shops for North America and Europe. BITEEZ Bitcoin T-Shirts A selection of quality 100% cotton Bitcoin T-shirts, various designs! BTCZone.com - Bitcoin ecommerce An online store that lets you search for products in many categories. Only for 48 continental United States. Free shipping on most bitcoin orders. CryptoAnarchy.US Bitcoin embroidered polo, only accepts bitcoin for payment. I Use Coins The original Bitcoin pride T-shirt Luana's Bijoux A Bijoux store. Currently sells earrings and bracelets. Nerd Merit Badges "Bought this badge with Bitcoins" badge R-Shirt Geeky pirate R-shirts Robots Never Die Accepting Bitcoins for all merch! The White Peacock Gothic Lolita clothing for BITCOINS! Og Dogg Records Hip-Hop music site accepting bitcoin payments for T-shirts and other Hip-Hop related merchandise. From Heart to Heart Unique, hand made jewellery. A special gift for yourself, your wife or your girlfriend. Pirate Printing Company An Open Business selling Bitcoin, Silk Road, and Snowden T-shirts (Free Download of Designs) Poppyluce Custom crafted jewellery and accessories Bitcoin Team on Etsy Etsy merchants accepting Bitcoin Windfire Chainmaille Chainmail jewelery HeatSlingers.com "Simply put, we are sneaker heads. We're just sneaker collectors who are sick of the eBay nonsense" Email for info on payment w/Bitcoins The Gentle Pony T-Shirts with weird jokes T.S. I Love You Hats Each T.S. I Love You hat is a one of a kind, hand-created piece, re-worked and assembled from precious old bits. Dri-Apparel Sports clothing, tee shirts, shorts, pants, hats, and totes. Soccer Uniforms Soccer shirts, shorts, socks and accessories, including customization services. ZAS robapinzas.com (OSM) Hippie Ethnic Alternative, clotes and much more... Shoes, accesories, piercing, decoration items. Wholesale and Retail. Accepts bitcoins. 7 Buck Tees Cool T-shirts for bitcoins. Sofia International International apparel sourcing agency, whole-sale and quantity orders only. CuffLinked Quality cufflinks fauteurs de troubles T-shirts Phone Lid stylish mobile phone cases Mosaika schmuck logo.png Mosaika Schmuck Swiss shop for hand-made jewellery, leather bracelets, necklaces, earrings and other accessories for men and women. Home Home & Stone The premier emporium for imported and domestic kitchen and bath fixtures. SurvivalFood.com Emergency and survival food storage supplies, including freeze dried food and MREs. Azurerocket Design Studio Cut vinyl decals for indoor and outdoor application. Accepts custom orders. Tina Produce Home decor in clever gift-ready packaging Fine Things Store Fine Things for your house and your family. Silver, Glass, Antiques. Judi Babcock's Paintings Paintings for sale, will ship anywhere in the continental U.S. Blue Canary Night Light Blue canary night lights nestorgames Independent publisher of portable board games. More than 60 titles in catalogue. Arimaa Game Set Animal themed board game designed to be hard for computers but easy to learn and intuitive for humans. Offers $10,000 challenge for programmers. The Critter Casual Pet wear Keystone Pet Place Pet food and supplies Telepienso Dog and cat food, top brands (Royal Canin, Hill's, Acana, Dr. Pet) Delivery to Spain, Portugal, and Balearic islands Dr. Pet Natural dog and cat food Joseph's Garden Open-pollinated landrace garden seeds. A Curbing Edge Decorative Landscape Curbing in the greater Orlando Florida area AuthenticFragrances.com Discount Brand Name Fragrances, Perfumes and Colognes at unbeatable prices. We only carry authentic brand name products. Small Happy Eagle Enterprises Specialty incense Axa Blends Fine Incense Blends Growing Turkish Tobacco GrowingTurkishTobacco.com offers a hardy strain of organically grown tobacco seeds, free worldwide shipping Electronics Jackie's Computers Canada - Desktops, Laptops & Accessories Gersics - (possible scam - negative response) Bitcoin Mining Hardware Made in Germany with full Garantee GSM Nation - Unlocked GSM phones and related products Chollomedia - Consumer electronic as micro-sd memories, and game accessories like flash carts (10% of discount for Bitcoin payments). GSMsolutions.ie - Supplies a vast range of mobile phone related accessories, parts and components. iPhone repair specialist and ships worldwide. TorGuard Store - DDWRT VPN Routers, HDTV Boxes, Android, NAS, Networking Accessories, Pre-Paid VPN Service and more! 7Del.net, Electronic Cigarettes AGNQ Tech - Computers and computer components for sale Bitcoin ecommerce - An online store that lets you search for products in many categories including electronics and accepts bitcoins. Free shipping on many orders. Bitcoinblaster.com Consumer Electronics in Bitcoins - Laptops, desktops, tablets, digital cameras, televisions and more! Inventory added all time. Bitcoinstore (info) Over 500,000 products. The world's largest Bitcoin only super store. Consumer Electronics, Computer systems, PC components, Laptops, TVs, Hard Drives, RAM, Cameras, Network parts. BitElectronics - Consumer electronics. Hundreds of products: PC components, tablets, cameras etc... Worldwide shipping! BitLasers, Handheld lasers and laser accessories. BitVapes, Electronic cigarettes (e-cigs), starter kits, replacement parts, accessories and nicotine e-liquids. BTCFPGA Sells "High Efficiency Bitcoin Mining Equipment". Budgetheat | Webshop Dutch webshop, all products about electric heating: heatingmats, heatingcables, heatingfilm, infrared panels and more. BuyB.it, Grown-Up Gadgets, Solar Power Gadgets, Tracking and Surveillance. Grown-ups Only. CellPhone-Jammers.com, Cell phone, GPS, GSM, 4G, Wi-Fi, Bluetooth, UHF jammers CoinBits.co.uk Sale of Graphics Cards, Motherboards, PSU's, CPU's, other PC components and Gadgets. A UK based startup company. CompSoul.com Sale of Computer Components, Systems, Electronics and More from Brand Names, Unique and Generic. Worldwide shipping available. Multiple payment options. Crypto Stick - An USB key for data encryption, signing and authentication. Available as Open Source. Cryptobuy Selling lasers, lights, surveillance, and other items. EcigFrenzy Selling electronic cigarettes, e-liquids, accessories, and more. Ecigsoutlet Over 90 flavours of eliquid. Ecigarettes, spares and accessories. Trading since 2009. Based in the UK, shipping worldwide. Bitcoin transactions are processed via Bitpay. Electric Green, Inc Grid-tied and off grid photovoltaic and solar thermal parts, design, and installation by a NABCEP certified professional. Electronic CigaretteElectronic Cigarette and Accessories, liquids, replacement's, and kits. EMWiRES bitcoin shop, RF tools, prototype boards, international shipping. Freedomcam.net GPS Dashcams for your car -to record accidents, tickets and other driving encounters. FrontierVapor.com - Electronic Cigarettes and Customizable Made-To-Order eLiquid. You can even create your own flavors! GADJA | shop Tablet PC, SMART tv, VIDEO Game, GPS, EDR. Go Green Solar Solar panels, batteries, charge controllers, and solar mounting hardware. KinLeaves.com - Stylish and protective vinyl wraps for electronic gadgets with free shipping worldwide. Mackabler.dk Danish eshop selling cables for Apple products, such as MacBooks, iMac, iPad, iPhone and iPods. Memory Dealers, Cisco, 3com, HP, Foundry, Juniper, optical transceivers. SFP, XFP, XENPAK, GBIC, DWDM, CWDM and more! NinjaBoot USB Privacy Drive, Boot to a little purple ninja, a USB drive that protects your privacy and anonymity with Tor. ODDepot Open electronic designs GoodGuyGregs.com - Electronic Cigarettes and craft eLiquid. Accessories, Upgrades, Starter Kits and more. Olsens-IT.dk A danish webshop with computer equipment and other electronics. Ozhobbies - LED Throwies, Construction Kits for Robots , electronic Components, solar cells and batch production of electronics. Revamp-it Switzerland, ecologically revamped computers, components and accessories, with support of free software. Webshop sending all around the world. Also a physical store with regular opening hours. Payment with bitcoins anchored in the webshop Terms and Conditions. Sisconet IT Solutions (possible scam) Computers, Laptops, Ipods, Mobile Phones, Printers, Cameras, Routers, Hard-Disks and more Consumer Electronics in bitcoins. Based in Switzerland. Shipping Worldwide. SynthShopping.com, Boutique Electronic Music Instruments Texas Laser Systems Supplier of lasers, components, and accessories located in Fort Worth, Texas. Thermostatenshop | Webshop Dutch webshop, all products about thermostats: wireless, flush mounted, surface mounted, digital analog, plugin and much more. UnixmediaShop - Home automation devices, ethernet/IP controlled I/O and relay boards Video Storm, Video & audio matrix switches for home theater applications. WTCR, Purchase computer components for bitcoin! All the latest brand new hardware and software is available at great prices, shipped right to your door! Vapor Cigarettes GO! Electronic Cigarette offers the best electronic cigarette igo4,igo3,ikit with touch charging, 50+ eliquid flavors & Ecig Accessories. Free shipping,30 day money back guarantee. pay with Bitcoin BeastMiners Cheap CPU servers, ideal for mining altcoins such as Primecoin, RieCoin or MemoryCoin. Consumables Salts Worldwide Gourmet Kosher Grade Salt and Sea Salt, such as Himalayan Salt, Fleur De Sel, Black Lava Hawaiian Salt, Red Alaea Salt, and Sel Gris. UrgeUSA A daughter company of BevByen providing Urge soda (the predecessor to the discontinued Surge soda) to US customers. KHI Botanicals Fresh kratom, kava and hard to find spices and herbs. Beefjerky.com accepts Bitcoin for our excellent, fresh beef jerky. We have six premium flavors. We offer FREE shipping to almost every country in the world. Bitcoffee Quality Coffee for bitcoins. Bside Logo.png Bside Italian Wine excellent vintages selection and much, much more. Buyer's Best Friend Wholesale Food, Healthy, and Beauty for Everyone - The Leading Source for Specialty & Artisan Products Online Green Ave Market Organic groceries online and in your neighborhood. Produce, juices, smoothies, coffee, healthcare, vegetarian, natural, gluten-free Maqui Berry Maqui Berry Superfruit in powdered capsules Cups and Cakes Bakery Cupcakes for bitcoins, San Francisco, CA Coastal Cake Company Cakes for special occasions and weddings, delectable treats, Parksville, BC, Canada Chocolate Coins Chocolate coins for bitcoins Artisan Chocolates UK Handmade and lovingly crafted chocolate from The Chocolate Tree, Edinburgh, Scotland CookieEater Cookies Oatmeal and Chocolate Chip Cookies Bitcoin Coffee Gourmet quality coffee at affordable pricing - (Does not exist. OK to delete?) BitBrew Premium and Organic Coffee Revolution Coffee Gourmet coffee at affordable prices Muggswigz Coffee & Tea co. Highest quality wholesale coffee and tea Belgian Flavours Belgian beers, chocolate, candy Edle Welten Oils, vinegars, teas, coffees, liquors, Germany Bitcoin shopping Olive Leaf Extract Capsules and Olive Leaf Extract with CoQ10 Capsules MH-UK Ethnobotanicals Herbs and plants including ayahuasca vines, Syrian rue, Acacia confusa stem bark, chacruna & chaliponga leaves, blue lotus, passionflower, kratom and cactus pieces. BuyAcaciaconfusarootbark.com Providing the highest quality Hawaiian Acacia confusa rootbark. Global shipping from USA George's Famous Baklava Highest quality baklava. We have been in business online and locally since 2009 Stateless Sweets Delectable homemade, all real ingredient candy, delivered to your home as a treat or for your next event to share Kereru Brewing Company Traditional and gluten-free craft beer from award winning New Zealand brewer Bitwein.de.vu Quality wine from Palatinate restrictions available. Candied bacon, cookies, breads, beef jerky, and more, freshly made when you order and shipped while fresh

honestbeef Australian Beef direct from the farmer. No additives, no preservatives, gluten-free Thai Food Essentials Kaffir lime leaf essential oil for cooking. Recreate the taste of authentic Thai food Bees Brothers Caramels, honey, lipbalm, honey roasted almonds, and candles from Utah. Don't tread on bees! Rollingdale Winery Organic wines and icewines, West Kelowna, BC, Canada - ships to locations in Canada only Cigarettes for Bitcoins Cigarettes, delivery only in the USA Cigs.eu Cigarettes Europe's leading discount cigarette shop now accepting Bitcoins. Cigs.eu offers a wide range of tobacco brands at a fraction of their local prices New Mexico Tea Company Sells bulk loose-leaf tea from around the world. PureBulk PureBulk offers a variety of over 250 pure nutritional powders, supplements, oils and capsules Ink Factory Toner and ink cartridges for printers, in United Kingdom, also ships to Europe Candy German Get a monthly box of German candy - chocolate, wine gums, cookies, gingerbread, licorice, marzipan. Choose a plan and subscribe for yourself or give as gift. Books Synergetic Press Independent publisher of key and paradigm-shifting material that deepens our understanding of Earth's living systems and the role of human culture within them. Get 10% off by ordering with bitcoins and using coupon code 'BITCOIN' Thunderune Publishing, Indie publisher with over 20+ imprints. Pirates of Savannah Website for historical adventure novel - ebooks and audio books for sale Starkmuth Publishing, publisher and distributor of the book "The Making of Reality – How Consciousness Creates the World" OBSOLETE! Magazine, Underground arts and lit newspaper, available electronically or by mail (does it accept bitcoin?) Prepa-Sciences-Politiques.net, Document preparing the common competition in french politics sciences (Bitcoin is the recommanded ecurrency). Bitcoin Step by Step, The Perfect book to get started in Bitcoins in a safe and secure manner. Bitcoin Mining Step by Step, The Perfect book to get started in Bitcoin Mining. XecNet Ltd UK-Based indie publisher of books such as Rossi's eCat. Plato's Cave Bookstore Used books at low prices Some Odd Pages bookbindery Bespoke binding, artists' books, repairs and rebindings. Brian Cramer Books Humorous science fiction books by author Brian Cramer. Two Scoops Press Selling technical books for the Python Programming Language and the Django Web Framework. Music Video Seconds New DVD concerts, movies, select CD's and misc eclectic products. Ships Internationally. EMWiRES bitcoin shop, Used and new compact discs, international shipping. ChantCd.com Gregorian chant CDs, hymnals, and traditional Catholic books. Dark Ambient Radio The first compilation cd that emerged aroud this radio project (incl. worldwide shipping) is now available for 1 BTC. Og Dogg Records - Hip-Hop music site accepting bitcoin payments for mixtapes/songs. Long Player - This is a brick & mortar vinyl only store in Berlin which accepts Bitcoin. SuperStarShop.com - Music on CD, Vinyl, DVD, Blu-ray. 3.000.000 items. Masguda's Bazaar - Work by composer and ethnomusicologist Masguda Shamsutdinova. Film/Movies Pattison Productions Feature length film/documentaries focussing on mountaineering. Planet FreeTV Create your own free tv channel. Watch movie channels online. $5 flat premium fee per month (accepting Bitcoins). Art and Artwork Some Odd Pages Book Arts Meg Green Book Artist and Bookbinding, repairs and bespoke services, workshops and courses in Book Arts, limited editions, unique volumes, hand bound leather sketchbooks and journals for the artist, writer, traveller and book lover. Bert Green Fine Art Fine Art Gallery in Chicago. Contemporary Fine Art. Discounts and free domestic shipping for buyers using Bitcoin. Chaz Sargent & Company Chaz Sargent & Company Private Sales Group, Contemporary Art - New York City, Paris, France. First NYC-based art dealer group providing select clients the option to transact using bitcoin Paintings and Drawings by Thomas Schmall Originals and poster prints of fantasy drawings, impressionistic oil paintings and everything in between. With an Bitcoin pay option. Theresa Byrnes Art Sale Atelier and show space in NYC. This sale is to raise funds for baby (due in Feb 2014), and to manage inventory prior to my return to Australia in May. CharlestonArtShop.comCharlestonArtShop.com an online art gallery based out of Charleston, SC that provides local South Carolina artists and photographers a platform to sell their artwork direct through the website. Collage / Mixed Media Paradox Prints, cut-up style collage made of words and phrases cut from magazines and assembled back together to form a picture of Abraham Lincoln's assassination at Ford Theater. And more. Comics Ask Teran questions on the meaning of life, practical matters, and romance for Bitcoin. Eye Bleed Ink, Comic book, web comic, and graphic novel artwork in both traditional and digital by artist John Watts Paintings Modern Art Paintings Original Abstract Oil Paintings and Fine Art reproductions in canvas from well renowned Argentinean Artist Teresa Piacentino. International Shipping. Bitcoin Accepted! Art Galleries Direct UK Based Original Art from around the world. EU and US Shipping available. Btcworks Beautiful Artworks, Paintings, Drawings - free shipping worldwide judibabcockpaintings.com Paintings of a "loose, colorful, impressionistic style, emphasizing movement". Will ship anywhere in the continental U.S. Erik White Gravitational Art, unique abstract paintings. Hi-res images available free. BTC accepted for originals. BitPremier The first-of-its-kind Bitcoin Luxury Marketplace. Real estate, luxury automobiles, jewelry and watches, home goods, travel and other high-end items. Out of the Blue Art Gallery Paintings, special exhibitions, classes and workshops, poetry. Cambridge, MA The Thomas Chung Drawings, paintings, graphics design Photography The Daly Photo, original photography, prints, canvas wraps, and more. Etsy store accepting Bitcoin payments by selecting "other" for payment type upon checkout. Icon Photography School, online photography school now accepting Bitcoin payments. Boris Austin Photography & Film, based between London and Beijing available for Documentary or Commercial Work. Discounts For Payments in Bitcoin! The Odd Shot, photography by Trevor Farrell Anja Putensen "Inner Landscapes", High-quality artistic prints on coated Aluminium Sheets Fullerton Photography, Professional Wedding and Event Photography in the Metro-Detroit and surrounding areas. Barnyard Photography, Wedding Photography, Videography, Photo Booths & Equipment Rentals. Serving Philadelphia, Delaware, New Jersey, and Maryland. Peter Yuen Photography, Animal photography by Peter Yuen, with print proceeds going to charity. 'Another Tree' on Etsy, Lo-fi, vintage and other photography. 'SomeoneJohn' on 500px, High quality, affordable photo prints sold via Bitpay. Rob Whitworth Photography, Asia based viral video and time lapse video specialist accepting Bitcoin payments Emory Dunn Photography, commercial and food photographer in the San Francisco Bay Area. SeagullPhotography , Family Portrait Photographer in Sydney North Shore and Hornsby Area, Waitara, NSW 2077, Australia BTC Stock Photos, Buy and sell photos for BitCoin. Buy photos for websites, advertisements and more. Sell high quality visual art and receive BitCoins directly in your wallet. Printmaking PostCards Otto Normalos Postkarten und Hoerbuecher, Postcards for discerning people - in German Art Production Musical Instruments Stomp Romp Guitars Guitars, Effects and Amps, Manchester, NH, USA. Ships worldwide. Gongs Unlimited Gongs Unlimited was the first store on the internet devoted to selling Gongs! That's right! Other stores might offer a gong or two (and now there is an imitator) but at Gongs Unlimited all we know, love, and sell are Gongs and Gong Accessories... We've been doing this since 2004 and we're still deliriously charming over the phone. Pro Audio Equipment Acoustic Panels Canada Canada-based online retailer of acoustic panels for studio and home theater. Gift articles Cups N Stuff, Personalized gifts, such as photo mugs, mousepads, coasters, etc. Candles, Webhosting, PCB, Exclusive gifts, Cheap webhosting, PCB handmade, etc. BitcoinSushi.com - Novelty keychains from Japan. vivid.net/store - Birthday Cards. Favicon b4c.jpg bit4coin.net (info) bitcoin gift vouchers - buy online and redeem for bitcoin at bit4coin.net Gold Rhino, South African luxury: handmade African art; crocodile, ostrich and buck leather goods; zebra, nguni, gnu and buck skins; ostrich eggs and Bitcoin specialty items. Craftsmanship RugR.US - Quality Silk Persian Rugs Carved Cases - Wood iPhone / Samsung cases. Handmade in Elkhart, Indiana. Order your own custom engraving online! Krager Custom Wood Products - Woodworker. I make heirloom quality items to your order. Craftwork From Heart to Heart - Unique, hand made jewellery from Switzerland. No two pieces are the same. (does it accept bitcoin?) Dear Husband Yarns, Hand-Dyed Wool yarns: Beautiful Yarns for Beautiful Projects Ore.e Refineries, Recycled metal products, raw metal products, and craft services Golden Mean Calipers Hand-crafted Mathematical Gadgets - Made in New Zealand rasselzoo.ch, stuffed animals handmade in Switzerland (broken) Plant Ideas Make your own body care products, Kits for lip balms, bath melts ,moisturisers and massage bars.Based in Scotland UK. Cubicdissection Collector-grade interlocking puzzles and puzzle boxes. Midwest Cord Paracord, Bracelets, Crafts, Craft Supplies. Collectables CAVITY Curiosity Shop - Underground books, art, records, tapes, vinyl, vintage games, collectables, clothing etc. Victoria, BC Canada. Shipping available. Financial Graph & Art, Large-format graphical displays of financial data to decorate your home, study, or office. Car Accessories 12v.kiev.ua Car batteries, car battery chargers, car battery accessories (Kiev, Ukraine). Muffler.pl, Car accessories (in Poland) Bitcoin shopping Windscreen Repair Kit Freedomcam.net GPS Dashcams for your car -to record accidents, tickets and other driving encounters. Bitcoin promotional articles BitcoinKeychains.com Bitcoin-branded metal keyrings/keychains. Wholesale options available. Bside Logo.png Bside Fair prices Bitcoin promo stickers and cool graphics, hoodies, polos, towels, t-shirts and much more. CryptoAnarchy.US Bitcoin Bumper Stickers 3"x10" UV protected vinyl, polo shirts, processors and computer parts Bitcoin Decals Two stickers available, priced only in Bitcoin. Bitcoin Cut Vinyl Decal Bitcoin decal available in several sizes and colors, matte (indoor) or glossy (outdoor). Prices in USD, accepts payment by BTC. Game accessories ABUGames Retailer of Magic the Gathering trading cards and accessories. Beauty products The Dirt Natural Trace Mineral Toothbrushing Powder. Paleo, Gluten-Free, Fluoride Free, Glycerine Free, GMO Free, Soy free, No sweeteners. Tasty and effective! Wholly Hemp Natural Skin Care (soap, lotion, lip balm, sunscreen, etc) with 25% of profits to charity. Worldwide shipping. Bitcoin Knotwork, Beauty, Nutrition, Home & Kitchen stuff, Personal Care stuff, teas, coffees, etc. etc. etc... Shaman Scents, 100% natural scented oil and essential oils. Jewelry, too! (does it accept bitcoin?) Soap Wreck Hand made soaps. In the Bay Area of Northern California. Beautiful on Raw Natural beauty products, we ship worldwide. Ora's Amazing Herbal All natural, synthetic-free skin care products. Great for people with chemical sensitivities. The base oil used in our lip balms and salves is infused with a blend of organic herbs for added healing benefit. Precision mechanics Horolotech Luxury Swiss Watches - Limited Edition Chronographs Printing Card25.com Printing services - business cards, postcards, banners, and more. 1000 Full-color business cards from $25 including shipping. Southern CA, USA Green Graphics Printing services, Oakland, CA BooshWorks Full-service discount print shop Snapily The first company ever to offer an online digital 3D (lenticular) printing service. You can customize your own 3D/flip photo-cards, notebooks, greeting cards, business cards, rulers, ornaments, and magnets. OpenPrints Buy and sell unique museum quality fine art prints. Children rasselzoo.ch, stuffed animals handmade in Switzerland Cozeebaby, sheepskin pram accessories for toddlers, shipped from Edinburgh, United Kingdom Manufacturing 3dtlac.com 3D Printing service, Creation of custom models from ABS and PLA plastic, Drawing of models in 3D. Etfett.net 3D Printed Things, AR.Drone modification kits, gadgets, iphone accesories, 3D printers, and decorative stuff. American Home & Habitat Inc "Specialized Textile Outfitters. Stuff you won't find in a regular fabric store" Ez3D - we make fun, colorful, and easy-to-use 3D printers danger!awesome (info) Laser cutting and printing, Cambridge, MA Flags Daily Anarchist Several varieties of anarcho-capitalist flags Health and Fitness The Health Cloud Health foods and nutritional supplements that are backed by science. Only the best! The Natural Fitness Trainers Association Convenient, ethical & affordable Personal Trainer Certification. Methods approved by an international health professional advisory board. 25% discount off certification fees, if you use bitcoin and mention that you found us here. Basic Membership is Free. Vapetropolis.ca Brand name, top of the line herbal vaporizers: the healthier way to smoke. Shipping to the U.S., Canada, and the U.K. MaquiOrac.com All Natural Maqui Berry Superfruit sold in powdered capsules. Lose Weight The Natural Way. Health Kismet Makes a green superfood supplement that condenses 38 of the world's healthiest foods into one powder. Adamant Barbell Home and commercial fitness equipment. Everything you need for Crossfit, bodybuilding, powerlifting and olympic lifting. Bear and Birch (info) Russian Banya and Spa - Invigorate, detoxify, revitalize, and enjoy an authentic Russian banya experience in Freehold, NJ Pacific Bliss Massage Enjoy relaxing massage at the spa or right on the beach in Vancouver, Canada. Pacific Bliss Yoga Daily yoga on the beach in the spring / summer months and in studio year round in Vancouver, Canada. Atlanta Kick Karate and Kickboxing Largest Martial Arts School in Atlanta Operation Boot Camp Multiple Locations around the US AK CrossFit CrossFit Gym in Buckhead Georgia Heroic Evolution DVD Courses Time-honored strength and physical training techniques based around mythological archetypes and deities. Certain to transform you in ways you never thought possible, helping you to gain the confidence and power to achieve your dreams. Kickass-Kombat.com Martial arts clothing, weapons and equipment from Kickass-Kombat.com. Free worldwide shipping, specializing in clothing, books, DVDs, gifts and weapons (including ninja-specific, katana, shuriken, kakushi and more) for Karate, Bujinkan Taijutsu, Judo, Aikido, Masaki Ryu, Shurikenjutsu, Kenjutsu and general Budo. Sportsfeed.ru, is your source for vitamins, nutritional supplements, and bodybuilding supplements. We offer all your favorite brands and thousands of products including: vitamins, meal replacement products, health supplements and more to support your health and fitness. YogiWay.eu Here you can find everything you need for your yoga lessons. Yoga mats, yoga tools, yoga bags, leg warmers and buckwheat meditation pillows. BitHerbs Quality herbs and natural products. BioStim Australia Australia's Premier Shop for Health and Sustainable Agriculture. Now Even Better with the Bitcoin Payment Option. Nootropics for Bitcoins - The International Leader in Nootropics, Cognitive Enhancers, and Brain Nutrition. BitHerbs Quality herbs and natural products. Ethos Healthy are now accepting Bitcoins as payment for their Ethos healthy lifestyle, fitness and sports nutrition products. BitOils Quality therapeutic essential oils. Medical Support Products, Inc. - Medical Equipment and Supplies Herbolab - Natural Products for Sexual Health Silk Bamboo Health - Distance energy healing and balancing with reiki and other energetic methods. Online Pharmacy CoinRx.com The #1 Bitcoin Online Pharmacy. Great service, low prices, international shipping, privacy assured. JCM Pharmacy Retail online pharmacy. Shipping quality generics from Ajanta, Cipla, Ranbaxy, Sun, and all major Indian pharmaceuticals worldwide from Mumbai, India. In business since 1962. EUpillz Secure and free EU-shipping of pharmaceuticals. The Swiss Pharmacy THE SWISS PHARMACY offers generic and brand medication, and is the first online pharmacy accepting Bitcoin! Kamagra for Bitcoin - Same as Viagra but cheaper! Shipping from the UK. Scientific Supplies Gene And Cell Technologies Stem cells, PCR supplies, and protein assay supplies. Other Detacher Co. Sells security tag detachers and deactivation devices. Currently, four best selling products are available for BTC payment (expansion to entire product listing pending on BTC take-up). Website established April 2011. BTC integrated September 2012. tit4bit Buy sex toys for Bitcoin. BitcoinGrow buy Bongs, Vaporizers and Growers stuff with Bitcoins - Worldwide shipping Promotional Products Mountain of Promos Custom imprinted promotional products. Over 16,000 products including Bags, Drinkware, Pens, USB Drives, Flashlights and much more. Professional services Language services (teaching, coaching, translation etc.) Edith Depner, learn-german-over-skype.com Intensive private German training with conversation, coaching and grammar, over Skype or phone. The world's first German teacher to accept Bitcoins. transmediacommunicationarchitect - English Language Services - Via Skype or available on site Health Care Physicians Dr. Pradeep Atluri, MD, PhD - Psychiatrist in Midtown Manhattan, New York, NY. Specializing in psychopharmacology and psychotherapy. Dr. Anseeuw Karel Family Doctor/ General Practitioner, Wouterstraat 7, 3500 Hasselt, Belgium My Doctor Medical Group Personalized Medical Care and Advocacy, San Francisco, CA Fertility Care of Orange County - Dr. C. Terrance Lee, Brea, CA Dr. Kveta Vojkovska (info) Pediatrician - Providence, RI and Boston, MA aMohel.com - Dr. Elizabeth Nadiv Pediatrician and certified Mohel performing Bris (Jewish circumcision) in San Francisco and the Bay Area Dr. Aaron Rollins Body sculpting, cosmetic surgery, laser surgery, liposuction, Beverly Hills, CA Chiropractors Dobbins Chiropractic - Alameda, CA Cohen Chiropractic Centre - Dr. Austin Cohen, Atlanta, GA Dentists & Dental Services Bitcoindentist.com - Drs. Kari & Nick Wilson - Anacortes, WA, USA, Private dental practice accepting Bitcoin in the greater Seattle region. Dr. Murad Thakur BDS MAGD Private dental clinic, Orlando, FL Dr. O. Nestor Reyes General dentistry, teeth whitening, root canals, extractions, operative dentistry, crown and bridge, dentures. Indianapolis, IN Douglas County Dental Clinic Nonprofit community dental clinic in Kansas that accepts Bitcoin donations. Emident Holistic metal free dental clinic focusing on heavy metal detoxification, especially mercury from amalgam, and instead using metal free fillings, non-metal crowns, and zirconium implants that don't harm your body. Meidänklinikka (OSM) Private dental clinic in Helsinki, Finland. Orthodontic Braces / SoCal - Free orthodontic consultation, Anaheim, CA. Millington Family Dentistry 901-872-8151 Memphis area private dental practice - General Dentistry Kinesiologia KineViña - Servicios a domicilio en la V región, Chile - kinesiología respiratoria, neurología adulta e infantil, kine deportiva, kine traumatológica, fisioterapia Creative services AgeisPolis, accepting bitcoin at generous rates for professional graphics/audio/web design, writing and editing services, digital film-making, win32/linux/OS X tech support & repair & performance tweaking, C++/PERL/PHP/HTML programming, server administration, creative consulting, and unreleased music from the band Tiny Pupils. Common Tone Records , Vermont based music and audio production facilities. We will produce your music and audio tracks for Bitcoin at current exchange rates as well as cash, check or credit card. Minimal Sound Injury, Audio Editing / Mixing / Mastering / MIDI Programming / Songwriting facility for Music and Broadcast Production & Postproduction. Jon Kubis Music, Pop and Jazz Piano/Keyboard lessons via Skype & iChat. Also music production & transcription/charts! (warning: autoplay) Red Barn Music School Music lessons and classes for a variety of instruments, Amherst, MA Obuie Produções, Sao Paulo/Brazil based Production House / Location Management / Creative Footage / Visual Effects and Motion Design / Post-Production facility (Autodesk Smoke 2012, Avid DS 10, After Effects). Accepting Bitcoin. (warning: showreel autoplay) Data Dynamics, Computer hardware and systems rental for 3d Rendering, Video Editing, and Data Processing. Located in the Southeast Michigan area. Fabien Dany Photography, does photography, freelance writing and cartography. You can also get Art prints in exchange for Bitcoins. 10% off for Bitcoin users. Last Decade Films, Film and Visual Effects from Chicago. Accepting Bitcoin now! DionysusCo. Entertainment, Full service production company specializing in filmed entertainment in Los Angeles. Accepts Bitcoin. Mas Music Productions, Mas Music Productions is the premiere recording studio in the center of Highland Park, Los Angeles. Accepts Bitcoin Professional Writing Services - An experienced writer creates high-quality written materials for business, professional, and personal purposes. Accepts payment in Bitcoins. Teiko FX - Digital video post-production/After Effects artist - animations, compositing, motion graphics, rotoscoping, visual effects Robot ARC - The Simple Way to Make 2D into 3D. We turn 2D drawings into 3D printer ready files. Consulting A&D Bitcoin Consulting helps companies and other organizations to assess the strategic implications from Bitcoin for their industry. Both founders have extensive experience in Bitcoin and Management Consulting. The website is in German but the consulting services are also offered in English. Grecoin, Bitcoin Merchant Services, BitPay Integrator, Greece & Cyprus. CompuSleuth, Computer forensics, legal support services, network security, Oracle consulting. Ohio USA. FarmGeek Ltd - You reap what we code FarmGeek Ltd: Professional web consultancy. Plenty of experience in high-traffic environments. Specialism with realtime software and Non-SQL based DB solutions. Contact us for a quote and make sure to mention bitcoin! 10% discount for ? paying clients! Quality Career and Business Consulting offers life and career consulting, as well as a variety of other business services SunriseLocal.com, We provide Reputation Protection and Reporting services to Business Owners worldwide. Monthly reports are delivered direct to your inbox including information about your business pulled from business review sites and social media. Find out what people are saying about your business with our NegWatch+ Reports. Inexpensive and thorough! koolhaus Our Mission, is your mission. riotnrrd networks inc., Since 1997, consulting and professional services for Linux/UNIX networks, high-traffic/high-availability environments, security/encryption, out-of-band communications and alternative energy systems. Specializing in adverse environments (marine/tropical/arctic/etc). Vanda Security, Information security consulting firm providing web application, and network security; penetration testing; security compliance; policy; and enterprise security programs. L33t Consultant, IT Consulting on Anything Security, Networks & Servers. All OS - All Software. BitcoinFunding.com, Raise money with bitcoins with this kickstarter style website. Volternal Consulting, IT Consulting Firm in Manistee County MI that also serves remote customers. Works with Windows and Linux computers. KeepYourAssets.net Asset Protection & Privacy Services since 1996 Network Professionals provides network and server consulting and support in Calgary, Alberta. Nutrition Facts Labeling serves restaurants, grocery stores, food manufacturers, and food product entrepreneurs with a variety of services, including FDA-compliant “Nutrition Facts” labels like the ones found on most food products in the United States. All services are performed by a licensed, registered dietitian. Distributed Energy Consulting provides professional expert energy consulting for making your home or business more efficient or utilizing renewable energy resources. Can also consult on technology and industry opinion. Sierra Permaculture Design offers permaculture design, consulting, project management and training in the Sierra Nevada foothills of Northern California. Bitcoin Venture Capital is a BTCVC firm committed to helping internet startups and merchants wanting to accept BTC. AlphaPixel offers cross-platform OpenGL/OpenSceneGraph/Digital Imaging/GIS/GPS, training, software, contracting and consulting Durand Interstellar, Inc. offers electronic product design services, custom and stock lighting controls. Free and Open Source Software consulting. We speak Spanish/English. We specialize in: Virtualization (private and public), LAMP, Networking, Security, Backup and Encryption. We offer personalized hosting solutions as well.

XiiTec IT Solutions, Inc. Offers IT Consulting services for small to medium size business. Services include: Network design, remote system administration, hosting, SEO. Located in downtown Vancouver and is the first consulting company to accept Bitcoin in Vancouver. jekor independent consultant: high-availability, business intelligence, machine learning, high-assurance software Job Boards Bitcoin Jobs Online - The Premier Bitcoin and Digital Currency Job Board. Free to Post Jobs and Résumés. Work 4 Bitcoin (info), List or Find jobs in the bitcoin industry for free - No fees. Work For Bitcoin (info), The first fully functional bitcoin freelance website including job tracking, free escrow service, rating system. BitGigs (info), Buy and sell tasks/services. Earn Bitcoins. For Bitcoin (info), Earn Bitcoin through micro jobs. The easiest way to get bitcoin. What Would You Do For Bitcoin? Bitcoin Jobs (info), job board. Submit job listings for free Bitcoinlinked.com job and project related(info)Bitcoin Job listing Service Rugatu Q&A Get bitcoins by answering questions completing bounties. Gold Line International International Financial Mutual Aid System Legal Services Judge.me Email arbitration. Arbitral awards are recognized and enforced by courts in 146 countries. Law 4 Small Business is proud to announce that it accepts Bitcoin for the payment of legal services. We are US-based business attorneys focused exclusively on small business issues, contracts, business formation (limited liability companies, LLC, S-Corp, C-Corp), intellectual property (trademarks, copyrights and trade secret), e-commerce and high-tech legal issues. L4SB doesn't require a retainer, and has no minimums. Home of the flat-rate contract review, for USD$25/page (minimum 4-pages). A little law now can save a lot later. Law Offices of Douglas Lloyd General practice law firm offering business, estate planning, landlord/tenant, contracts, and more. Massachusetts USA. Legal Prime GSC, JSC Law firm, litigation and arbitration, debt collection and recovery, legal consulting. Moscow, Russian Federation. CompuSleuth, Computer forensics, legal support services, network security, Oracle consulting. Ohio USA. SwayLaw Trial exhibit labeling, trial exhibit databases, discovery databases, and other litigation support services. Local Massage Massage4BTC Free to post ads for local massage services. Psychotherapy / Counseling Philip Kolba Counseling Mobile counseling and personal consulting, specializing in relationship, career, and self-improvement with LGBTQ individuals, couples, and poly relationship members. Available online (via video, voice, email, IM) and in-person at Portland, Oregon, USA office. Free initial consultation. Mikolaj Czyz Process oriented individuals and couples psychotherapy. therapywarsaw.com Psychotherapy and psychological services in Warsaw, Poland. Counseling available in English, Polish, Swedish, and Danish. Chris Ferrante, M.A. LGBTQ-friendly counselor, specializing in the treatment of anxiety for individuals in Portland, Oregon, USA. Alexandra Korsunskaya LCSW Psychotherapy in the San Francisco Bay Area, California, USA. Psychotherapy Online with Walter Logeman. Use email for in-depth psychotherapy, for personal and relationship development. English. Insurance Shield Mutual Provides insurance for truth-tellers, agorists, pirates, activists and innocent bystanders. Repair and Maintenance Services Build it. New construction & remodeling for residential & commercial real estate servicing southern California in Orange & San Diego counties. Visit our website for more information. Elmer Appliance Repair Providing in-home residential appliance repair services to the area surrounding north Spring, The Woodlands, and Conroe, Texas. Bitcoin shopping Windscreen Repair Kit On-Site Oil & Lube Oil, lube, tire, battery, and other services done on-site by appointment. Serves the Atlanta, GA area. Volternal Consulting, IT Consulting Firm in Manistee County MI that also serves remote customers. Works with Windows and Linux computers. iMania.dk iOS / Apple mobile device repair. Located in Aalborg, Denmark, est. Nov. 2010, with send-in international service, and in person repair service at store by appointment. Software - Professional services Ad Server Solutions Ad tech company providing Ad Serving products such as ad server, ad management, ad exchange, ad network, RTB, real-time bidding, auction engine and optimizers for display, video, social, iptv and mobile advertising. Offerings include advertising, software licensing, software source codes, SaaS "software as a service", white label software, private branding software, programming and software development. Giant Oak Studios Freelance Game developer, developing addictive games for iPad iPhone and Flash. FarmGeek Ltd - You reap what we code FarmGeek Ltd: Professional web and app development in the UK. We can bring your ideas to life. We work in Ruby, python, Java, NodeJS. Plenty of experience in Android development, and lots of experience building API clients. Contact us for a quote and make sure to mention bitcoin! 10% discount for ? paying clients! Ufasoft, Wireless Snif, SocksChain & Lisp software Worker72a, Graphics utility Plug-ins for Adobe Illustrator versions 8 through CS5. Mac only. Discounts for bitcoin payment. Arsy, Freelance software developer specializing in iOS, iPhone, and iPad applications Opensourcerer (onion site) provides C# & VB.NET coding services, along with computer help. Only accepts Bitcoin. Opensourcerer On Onion if you're worried about security :P Network PDF Server Software Appliance, YAFPC-Appliance is a Network PDF Server. It's coming on a bootable CD image in combination with an easy to use installation script. Once automatically installed, any PC or virtual machine booted from this image can act as a PDF-Printserver which provides an unlimited number of network shared virtual PDF-Printers. Pasky's Programming Help offers near-realtime support for programmers (C, UNIX, Perl, Git and general algorithmization) as well as custom coding services. CHWS Bespoke trolling and lulz solutions, written in Perl. Away RJN Cryptography, If you have pictures, files or data that are for your eyes only, use the best and fastest encryption available. Point Zero Trading Solutions - A company that creates Metatrader (MT4/MT5) software: indicators, expert advisors and scripts. Bits of Proof - Enterprise Bitcoin Solutions. ImpulsLab - mobile and desktop software for iOS, Windows Phone 7/8, Mac OSX, Windows desktop 7/8 InterApp'ed™ - Proud Canadian-based organization providing custom websites and software development for client/server, desktop, mobile and web based applications. BPJ Code offers development, consulting, and sysadmin services. Strongly *n*x-focussed. Technical support Snaz.Com IT Services, Remote Computer Repair, 15 years experience, BBB Accredited - We can remotely fix your PC, Mac or Linux computers and servers. Revamp-it Switzerland, online real-time Linux support from a company specializing in Linux computers. Volternal Consulting, IT Consulting Firm in Manistee County MI that also serves remote customers. Works with Windows and Linux computers. Great Scott Consulting Services, IT Ninja in the greater Los Angeles area CompuSleuth, Computer forensics, legal support services, network security, Oracle consulting. Ohio USA. Mac Experts, Apple certified Mac support in Canberra Omnifarious Software Consulting - High end software consulting in the Seattle area. Dr. Schwartzkopff IT Services Services and Consulting for Linux Clusters, Network Management and IT Security from the author of the O'Reilly book about Linux Clusters. SoftRare Monthly IT support flatrate.. The more month you subscribe for, the more $$ or BTC you save per month. Ryan Shaw IT, for all your computer needs! Based in Perth, Western Australia. We build Bitcoin mining 'rigs' too! Computer Tech Service General computer repair, service, upgrades; web design and e-commerce. RK Future Tech Web Development, Ecommerce Development, Custom Application Development, Software Product Development, Custom SharePoint Development as well as Mobile & Smart Phone Application Development Hi-Tech Hookup Computer/Electronics repair and services. US business serving North and South Carolina for on-site services, remote services available. Hemingway Repair Computer and other electronics repair. Serving the Iowa City area, USA. ServiQuinto Computer support, remote support, Operating Systems and software. Total Technologies Computer Support for Home and Business - Repair, Security, Consulting. Most major cities, USA. Web Development Accelerated Global - SEO, Social Media and Internet Marketing Website Design We provide professional web development services including SEO (search engine optimization), Internet marketing and social media support (Twitter, Facebook, YouTube etc) for your existing website, or we can build you a brand new website to your specifications. We work within any budget acceptable to the client. Bitcoin Is Accepted Here. FarmGeek Ltd - You reap what we code FarmGeek Ltd: Professional web and app development in the UK. We can bring your ideas to life. We are a quality web firm, so we provide Ruby, NodeJS, android and PHP5.4 development (including WordPress). Contact us for a quote and make sure to mention bitcoin! 10% discount for ? paying clients! Web Shaped Development Finnish HTML5 web development shop. Specialising in Rails and Node.js web solutions. myHostingWay.com Development of professional turn-key websites equipped with easy to use Content Management System, Specialized in Real Estate Websites and Website Management. Zulius US based web developer and system admin (Linux/PHP/Perl/MySQL/jQuery). Velas Web Design Easy, Professional, Affordable. Custom websites for small businesses using WordPress or Drupal. Concept Laboratory, Time saving plugins for osCommerce/ZenCart/osCMax based shopping carts. YK Goon, independent developer specializing in web applications and hosted iPhone/Android applications. Trade Service - Websites that are selling. Marketing Advantages integrated HTML5 Web projects... RK FutureTech Software Development, Outsourcing World Wide, Bitcoin Projects, Java, ASP,.NET,PHP & All Languages Assured Web Development Web developers "focused on rapid development and extreme programming." Brouwer Systems Group Systems Design & Development, Websites, Managed Hosting Service, Internet Marketing, Technical Support, Coaching, Training and Education SaKul (skype:kuldeep.dhaka) :- Custom Web Development And Design, WordPress Plugins And Theme, CakePHP, jQuery Plugins, PHP, HTML5, CSS3. About Us: "We are two brother and students applying our technical knowledge to learn and earn so as to cater the financial requirements for our hobby projects." Web App France base web development company. Mendels Creative Solutions Israeli based web design and development company. Mobile apps, Facebook apps, Bitcoin Payment gateways. Randy Brito Web design and development. Ann Jones Digital - Internet Marketing Stunning web design, awesome social media marketing, amazing campaigns. Specialties: mobile sites, Joomla & eCommerce. All for just a few bitcoins Liira Media - Web Marketing A full service web marketing agency specializing in website design and development, search engine optimization, social media management, pay-per-click campaign management, and brand/reputation management. All of our work is responsive to all mobile devices, standard. Contact us today for a free quote InterApp'ed™ - Proud Canadian-based organization providing custom websites and software development for client/server, desktop, mobile and web based applications. Wiser Web Solutions Inc - Ottawa, Canada - Experts in developing Joomla, WordPress, OpenCart websites & online stores. Begin accepting your own Bitcoin payments today. Complete websites starting at only 25?. Contact us today for more details. Architecture and Engineering Services Ottonodi (OSM) Architecture and engineering services, Italy - Rome. Other - Professional services CapStar Lending - Texas Refinance Loans and More with CapStar Lending serving Austin and Texas MDM Home Cleaning Professional home cleaning service, larger Boston area Quadrupeds Dog walking and pet care services, Boston, MA Financial and Accountant services We offer financial and accountant services for business that works in Mexico or want to work in Mexico. Leemeta Translations Translation and proofreading in 83 major European and other languages. English - Lithuanian Translations English - Lithuanian – English translation services. English - French Translations English - French translation and proofreading services AzulmArinO traducciones English-Spanish-French translation, proofreading, localization, video subtitling and voice-over BairesClases Personalized Spanish courses for any level. Face to face lessons in Buenos Aires, Argentina, and classes over the Internet for students anywhere in the world Learn Cantonese over Gtalk or Skype Japanese - English Translations Japanese to English freelance translator Quality Nanny Services provides full time, part time, and temporary nanny/babysitter placements for families in all major cities UKcopy English Correction, Copy Writing, Proof Reading CV Proofreading Fast Scanning Document scanning services Nancy the Notary Notary Public serving the greater Los Angeles area and Orange County. NNA (National Notary Association) certified, background screened and certified Notary Signing Agent. Bonded and E&O insured. Specializes in Real Estate signings and Apostille Service for documents going abroad. North Hollywood/Los Angeles Internet Cafe Internet terminals, CD/DVD burning, printing, scanning, fax, etc. Los Angeles, CA wash.io Laundry & Drycleaning Express Pick Up & Delivery, Los Angeles, CA Micro-ondes (info) Electromagnetic radiation measurements Sports Massage London Sports massage therapist, London Draper University (info) Entrepreneurship Program for Business Thought Leaders and Innovators, accepting tuition in bitcoins Sanshinkai Aikido Utrecht Lessons in the Japanese martial art of Aikido, Utrecht, Netherlands Universal Life Church of KY (AKA The Bitcoin Church) Get married or handfasted with Bitcoins - we are here to help you spiritually in any way we can Meidänklinikka Dental Repair. Get your teeth repaired for Bitcoin. Helsinki, Finland Anonymailer Send (optionally anonymous) letters from London, UK to anywhere worldwide for Bitcoin Christopher Rütman / Bigoudi Salon Hair styling and extensions. Woodland Hills, CA Keabiz Bookkeeping And Consultancy LTD Accountancy, Bookkeeping and consultancy services in the UK. Northwest Registered Agent Helps clients form and maintain corporations, limited liability companies (LLCs), and other business entities. Commerce and community Teitelbaum Pedorthics Certified Pedorthist. Trained in the manufacturing, fitting and modification of foot appliances and footwear to assist with various foot problems. Charity BitCharity, Use Bitcoins to donate to your favorite charity Bitcoins for Charity, donate your clock cycles to the greater good! BTC4C aggregates charities that directly accept Bitcoin donations on their own behalf; there's no middle man. Watsi Directly fund low-cost, high-impact medical care for people in need. Cards4Coin.com Donations to charities on your behalf that do not accept Bitcoin directly. Dark Stone Bromelias Practice Center is a nonprofit run place in the Atlantic forest of Brazil open to anyone who seeks to cultivate understanding, respect & care for all beings & natural systems through mindfulness. We regularly host retreats but you can come and stay here anytime and enjoy this calm and peaceful place surrounded by nature. Douglas County Dental Clinic, Nonprofit community dental clinic in Kansas that accepts Bitcoin donations. PeaceGeeks, Support international peace and human security projects Sean's Outpost Homeless Outreach Center, Pensacola, FL Church of Saint John the Evangelist, Support a church with Bitcoins! Sea Sheperd Australia Non-profit ocean protection and conservation organization, committed to protecting wildlife and ecosystems of the oceans Puppy Hub Dog rescue organization, bringing together rescue groups, shelters and pounds, municipal animal control, and anyone interested in fostering or adopting a dog in need. Web Communities Cryptocurrency business forum Community of people that do business with cryptocurrencies where you become share holder just by participating. Merchants Accepting Bitcoin Forum A free marketplace and forum for vendors who accept bitcoin Bitcoin Bookmarks, A collaborative directory of Bitcoin sites categorized by tags and ranked by users. Freedom Feens Podcast Tazing you with liberty since 2011. Takes bitcoin, and frequently discusses bitcoin and other crypto-privacy issues. Rugatu Q&A Community Ask questions with bitcoins, or have a bitcoin freelance job. Financial Services BillPayForCoins Pay any bill with bitcoins - fast and convenient Flattr Bitcoin micropayments on many online sites including YouTube, flickr, vimeo, Instagram, github, soundcloud, etc. Bitmit Marketplace with escrow and ID verification service with no fees Favicon b4c.jpg bit4coin.net (info) Bitcoin gift voucher - buy online and redeem for bitcoin at bit4coin.net Coingig The Bitcoin Marketplace - Buy and Sell Products Worldwide For Bitcoin. Escrow Service Provided. BTCrow (info) Bitcoin Escrow service which protect both buyer and seller Thru Coin Bitcoin escrow service Bitbond.net (info) Peer to peer Bitcoin debt instruments BTCJam Peer to Peer Bitcoin Lending BitcoinFog Secure Bitcoin Anonymization, a mixing service with advanced randomization operating exclusively through Tor Bitexchange Bitcoin laundry and exchange. [Caution - operated anonymously] BitLaundry (info) pseudo-randomly scheduled Bitcoin decorrelation service Cleanbit (info) A multi-walleted mixing service with PGP option for encryption transfer addresses The Bitcoin Laundry (info) A simple, single-hop Bitcoin laundery service Bitcoin Builder Automatically buy bitcoins on MtGox with a recurring schedule Crypto-finance Investments Bitcoin investment fund DOTS investment strategy This simple "Sell in May" strategy outperformed S&P500 for the last 6 years and never lost. Save over 30% on subscription if you pay with bitcoins. BTC-Asia Secure Bitcoin escrow service with an Affiliate Program Bahtcoin (info) mobile payments (Thailand) PikaPay Logo.pngPikaPay (info) Bitcoin Micropayments via Twitter BitGlory Investment Fund for Bitcoin, Earn 15% every month from your investment, automatic withdrawal Information services BitcoinTribune.com Larest Bitcoin News, Prices and Other Information. The Premiur News Site for Everything Related to Bitcoin. Learn how to Buy Bitcoins Efficiently by Reading Our Detailed Guides and Reviews. World Class Reporting. Coindesk.com Bitcoin News, Prices, Charts, Guides & Analysis. The Voice of Digital Currency. BitcoinValue.net In-depth News and Information Related to the Value of Bitcoins from Economics Perspective. Built in Bitoin to USD, EURO, GBP, CAD, and AUD Calculator Using the Averages of Coinbase, Bitstmap and BTC-E. BitcoinMaps.org World map of local businesses and individuals that are currently accepting Bitcoin as payment. Official Irish Bitcoin Assocciaton, Our function is to take all reasonable steps to ensure that the Bitcoin Industry is properly promoted throughout Ireland. List your business for free. Bitcoin News, all the bitcoin related information, gathered on one page, also providing thematic rss feeds, fee service accepting bitcoin donations Bit QnA (info), a Question and Answer service powered by bitcoins Bitcoin Report, Latest Headlines from Around the World about Bitcoin. Nearby Bitcoin Node List, Get the IP Address of 10 Local Bitcoin Clients to add to your bitcoin.conf file. Bitquestion Ask questions with a bitcoin reward, provide wanted information to earn bitcoins. Bitcoin Game List Free listing service to Submit & Find Bitcoin games Bitimap.net Find local private/public bitcoin dealer and meeting points BTCnews Nederland Bitcoin news, articles and information in Dutch. Aussie Bitcoiners Bitcoin news, information, resources and services for Australians Directories Bitcoin Cheddar - A 100% free bitcoin directory. BitcoinCatalog.com - Directory for Bitcoin Sites and Shopping, plus a Bitcoin Social Network! Geocode Source - Provide geocoded business directory listings of local business listings, geocoding services, and databases of the world, with regions, cities, zip/postal codes, latitude and longitude information. Bitcoin.Travel - Bitcoin directory of online and real world businesses that currently accept Bitcoin. 4Bitcoin.TK - Strives to be a comprehensive directory for everything Bitcoin. The Bitcoin List - A Bitcoin directory, includes reviews. Bitcoiney - Directory of top-rated bitcoin websites and services, along with free advertising for site owners. Bitcoin Cheddar - A bitcoin business directory. useBitcoins.info - A directory of Bitcoin-accepting merchants offering services and goods, along with Bitcoin information. DailyBitcoiner - Features a trusted Bitcoin-accepting merchant every day, with an archive of all previously listed merchants. Advertising AdServingSolutions.com Ad Serving Solutions offers advertising and ad space for sale. Online advertising network. We monetize billions of ad impressions each month. Low CPM for display ads and mobile ads. Country targeting - Geo Targeting. Advertise today, pay with Bitcoin! BC-Commerce BC-Commerce is ad network service where advertisers can promote their product or services using bitcoins. Advertisers can use PPC or PPV model for textual or graphical advertising. Webmasters are getting paid for promoting advertisers products and can set up minimum payment per view or click they want to obtain. BC-Commerce allows only legal content to be advertised on legal websites. Bitcoin PR Buzz Bitcoin PR Buzz’s mission is simple: to aid in the diffusion and adoption of Bitcoin as the emergent decentralised currency of the 21st Century through offering massive Press Release services for Bitcoin ventures, geared at generating massive exposure for your unique Bitcoin project, business, or concept. Help us tell the world about you! CoinURL Monetize your links and websites! Available interstitial ads like AdFly and text/image keyword-based contextual advertising similar to the Google AdSense. Targeting by location, language and devices. Network-wide and particular website bidding. Strong protection against fraudulent clicks. Zero commission and deposit/withdrawal limits. Easy revenue sharing between website owners and content creators. Bitvisitor Earn free bitcoin for visiting websites! Advertisers can purchase pre-qualified Bitcoin users. BitcoinAdvertising.com This is an adsense style service for advertisers and publishers. Publishers make money for CPC. 2% fee lowest in the industry. BungeeBones, collaborative web ad creation and marketing for any website- pay and/or be paid in BTC Operation Fabulous, advertisement platform for advertisers and website owners Anonymous Ads Promote your link or get promoted for BTC Bitcoin Pyramid Ads Pay any amount and get unlimited impressions for your ad BitcoinPixels Visual Directory for Promoting Bitcoin Related Businesses and Websites Only. Free advertising for those offering an affiliate program. Daily Bitcoins, Bitcoin faucet, sponsored by ads. Competitive Cost per Mille and Cost per Click rates, geotargeting. Rolls Royce and Bentley forum, bitcoins as payment for advertising on the site Prikachi, Bitcoins get 20% discount from the banner advertisement prices Bitcoin shopping Display unit - Mobile Shop Hawaii News Daily - News and commentary website based in Hawai`i. Accepts Bitcoin payment for ads. FeedZeBirds - Advertise on Twitter with Bitcoins Bitcoin Magazine (info) - Advertise in the physical magazine or on the website BitcoinAdSmart Intelligent Keyword/GeoIP/Channel driven Pay-Per-Click Bitcoin advertising for Bitcoin websites. Puppy Twist 90% payout advertising. Very simple, no signup. Outbounders.com International call center, telemarketing, lead generation, appointment setting, B2B telemarketing RentHop Apartment rental search engine that ranks and sorts apartment listings based on the performance of the listing on our site, the responsiveness of the broker or property manager who posted the listing on our site and the accuracy and completeness of the listing. Apartments in NYC, Chicago and Boston, expanding nationwide in 2014. Brokers and property managers using BTC to pay for apartment listings receive 60% discount to USD pricing! Steal The Pixels! Get free or cheap pixel blocks from the big banner on our homepage, and put your advertising in there. We are commiting ourselves to do proper SEO and keep the site well established on Google, it's not yet another amateur pixel advertising. You can also "steal" blocks from other advertisers, find out how. BTC and LTC accepted for paid pixels. LocalCoinAlert - Email alerts when a local business starts accepting bitcoins.

Political Activism Electronic Frontier Foundation (EFF), Defending Your Rights in a Digital World Libertarian Party (info) The American party that actually represents you and respects you as a unique and competent individual. Our goals are minimum government and maximum freedom. Students for Liberty Organization dedicated to intellectual and academic freedom, social freedom, and economic freedom Eric Olson for Congress Campaign to elect Libertarian Eric Olson as North Dakota's US House Representative school of privacy Activists dedicated to privacy awareness, accepting donations in bitcoins freedomhacker Blog about security, privacy, and internet freedom, gladly takes donations in bitcoin! Local Goods/Services Coinster Local Marketplace, Connect to exchange coins for local goods and services Travel / Tourism / Leisure Transportation / Tickets Bitfare: Buy Transit Passes, Tickets, Tokens, Add Value to Fare Cards with Bitcoin. Available in several US cities. Taxizen Herefordshire UK Pay for Taxi fare with Bitcoin. Chicago Cabbie Friendly taxi service. Wi-fi enabled cabs. Yellow Checker Star Taxi / Satoshi Cab Taxi with WiFi, Las Vegas, NV 1taxinvBLwDAb1tjyTYzhcyb1fNKfivAB A Class Limousine Various luxury vehicles from sedan to van, stretch limo, and bus, New York and Philadelphia Ukraine Trains Train tickets for travel in Ukraine. Book on-line and collect at Kiev station or delivery worldwide. Events Salsafestival Bodensee 2013: Buy your ticket for the Salsafestival Bodensee at Kreuzlingen (Lake Constance / Switzerland), June 22-23, 2013. Restaurants and cafes North America Foodler Food delivery service - order from any participating restaurant with bitcoins Planet Linux Cafe Open source cafe, meeting place, and hackerspace - coffee, sandwiches, sweets, and great events, Coral Gables, FL Veggie Galaxy Vegetarian Restaurant and Bakery, Cambridge, MA Thelonious Monkfish Sushi and Asian Fusion, Cambridge, MA Yoki Japanese Restaurant & Sushi Bar - Traditional and Innovative Japanese Cuisine, Cambridge, MA MexiCali Family owned tacqueria - fresh burritos, tacos, enchiladas, quesadillas, nachos, soups, salads, and chili. Cambridge, MA. Want to pay with bitcoins? Ask for Eric. Voltage Coffee & Art Coffee, tea, sandwiches, bagels, and art, Cambridge, MA FoodbyFone FoodbyFone - restaurant, takeaway, delivery service accepting Bitcoin EVR Lounge (info) Enjoy gourmet cuisine by celebrity chef Chris Nirschel, cocktails by mixologist Orson Salicetti, and an interactive and unique art experience in the heart of Manhattan, NY O'Crepes (OSM) Crepes, sandwiches, fresh lemonade and more, Brooklyn, NY Kosher Diet Delivery Gourmet kosher meal delivery throughout the New York Tri-State area Hudson Eatery (info) Hudson Eatery, New York, NY Coupa Café Venezuelan Restaurant and Cafe - organic and fair trade. Palo Alto, CA Sake Zone (info) Japanese Cuisine / Sushi, San Francisco, CA Ocean Blue Sushi (info) Fresh gourmet sushi, Sunnyvale, CA Eclipse Coffee Shop (OSM) Brunch, sandwiches, salads, milkshakes, coffee, and more. Montevallo, AL Remedy Café Indian restaurant and chai bar. Edmonton, AB Sweet Tooth Cafe (OSM) Everything from cinnamon buns made from grandma’s recipe, famous home style Pad Thai, homemade soup to Italian specialty coffee drinks. Vancouver, BC India Gate (info) Indian Restaurant - fresh and yummy North Indian cuisine, Vancouver, BC Cabin 12 (info) Breakfast, lunch, dinner, and great community. Restaurant in Victoria, BC Bandung (OSM) Indonesian Restaurant, dining in, pickup, delivery in the larger Madison area. Madison, WI American Sandwich Co. Fresh sandwiches, soups, salads, smoothies, catering, Coopersburg, PA GrubGo Restaurant delivery service - order via GrubGo from participating restaurants and GrubGo will deliver, MO and IL Firehouse BBQ (OSM) Barbecue for Bitcoin! Barbecue, Cajun & Creole Restaurant, Salt Lake City, UT Tabita Bakery Pizzas, cakes, pastries, crepes, and crafts. Mexico City, Mexico Europe Austria Lieferservice.at - online food delivery service Belgium Pizza.be - online food delivery service France Pizza.fr - online food delivery service Germany Berlin: (OSM) - Devil's Kitchen Restaurant and Bar Berlin: Fabelhaft Bar (info) Cocktailbar Berlin: (OSM) - room77 TexMex, Jazz, and Swing Lieferservice.de - online food delivery service, Germany Greece Agia Efimia, Kefalonia Isl.: (OSM) - Carena Bar Restaurant Breakfast, Coffee, Dinner, Cocktails The Netherlands Amsterdam: (OSM) - Waries Thai Food Thai Food Restaurant & takeaway Amsterdam: (OSM) - Hofje van Wijs Arnhem: (OSM) - Café de Beugel Arnhem: (OSM) - The Cavern Café Arnhem: (OSM) - Café Den Koopman Arnhem: (OSM) - Dames & Heren Culinair Café Arnhem: (OSM) - Café Restaurant Diehl Arnhem: (OSM) - Restaurant Karakter Arnhem: (OSM) - Café Kleyn Arnhem: (OSM) - Kohinoor of India Arnhem: (OSM) - Mo Lòn Sandwiches and more Arnhem: (OSM) - Njoy Café Arnhem: (OSM) - Café Pavlov Arnhem: (OSM) - Restaurant De Smidse Arnhem: (OSM) - Café Stout Delft: (OSM) - Stadscafé De Waag Great food, coffee, drinks, music, free wifi, and mezzanine seating. Delft: (OSM) - Proeverij De Waag Culinary delights and fine wines, À la carte and customized dining in a unique historic setting in a centuries old building. Meppel: (OSM) - Buongiorno uw Italiaanse Delicatessenzaak Thuisbezorgd.nl - online food delivery service, Netherlands Switzerland Lieferservice.ch - online food delivery service United Kingdom Cambridge: (OSM) - The Devonshire Arms Restaurant & Pub Cambridge: (OSM) - The Haymakers Restaurant & Pub London: (OSM) - The Pembury Tavern Restaurant & Pub Norwich: (OSM) - The White Lion Restaurant & Pub Peterborough: (OSM) - The Coalheavers Arms Restaurant & Pub Takeaway.com - online food delivery service, UK Restaurant Directories Mercado Bitcoin Restaurant Directory Bitcoin Restaurants - online directory of US restaurants that accept BTC for payment Bed and Breakfast Lekkerurlaub Notaufnahme (info) (OSM) Guest House and Bistro, Berlin Bed and Breakfast Del Corso, Naples, Italy (OSM), Located in Naples' center, near Central Station and principal pubblic transport, offering a free breakfast, wifi, private and huge bathroom. We accept payment in BTC with value of days of reservation, we make a bill in EUROs for italian fiscal laws. bnbdelcorso@gmail.com for info. El Diablo y la Sandía, Oaxaca, Mexico (OSM). Charming Bed and Breakfast located a few blocks away from the Zócalo (main place) in the center of Oaxaca city. See review on TripAdvisor. Hostels El Hostelito (OSM) Feel free to drop by Guadalajara. It's not a hostel but a nice house near the Hipster district in Chapultepec. For more info, check out our blog page. We are also on AirBnB. Frankville is a cool hostel in La Plata, Argentina. Email us for instructions of how to pay your reservation in Bitcoin (we use BitPagos). Pacific Tradewinds Hostel is a small friendly hostel in the heart of San Francisco. Instructions for Bitcoin payments and reservations are located here. Hotels Villa SART Guest house with a family atmosphere, located in the center of the Gdansk-Sopot-Gdynia area, Poland Global Travel Club MLM 'cycler' based on hotel search Urban Living Suites Home-style short-term rentals in Downtown Toronto, Canada 20mission Entrepreneur co-housing in the Mission District of San Francisco, CA Pedro's Hotel (OSM) San Pedro, Belize Hotel Garden Cordoba, Argentina Hotel San Martin (OSM) Mendoza, Argentina Killeena House (OSM) Apartment rental units at a park estate, washers & dryers, billiards and game room, sauna, etc. Cork, Ireland Alquile el Apartamento Love Spain en La Cala Hills Hotel apartments at the Mijas Coast near Malaga, Spain Other Accommodations Middle East Galilee Bedouin Camplodge Tent accommodation by the name Shevet Ahim, which means Brothers’ Tribe. Located in Northern Israel. South America Dark Stone Bromelias Practice Center, is nonprofit run place in the Atlantic forest of Brazil open to everyone who seeks to cultivate understanding, respect & care for all beings & natural systems through mindfulness. We regularly host retreats but you can come and stay here anytime and enjoy this calm and peaceful place surrounded by nature. Copa Apartments - Your Place in Rio de Janeiro Short-term apartment rentals in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil International JRT Property - List your property for rent / sale in Bitcoin!, 1 month FREE or pay with bitcoin for longer listing duration. Worldwide listings. 9flats.com - Private Apartments, Vacation Rentals, Guest Houses and Rooms Houses & Apartments Adormo.com - Verified and reviewed apartments, houses and villas for short term - similar to Airbnb, founded in 2001 Apartment directory on bitcoin.travel AE Property Management (info) Rental properties in Shelby County, TN RentHop Apartment rental search engine that ranks and sorts apartment listings based on the performance of the listing on our site, the responsiveness of the broker or property manager who posted the listing on our site and the accuracy and completeness of the listing. Apartments in NYC, Chicago and Boston, expanding nationwide in 2014. Brokers and property managers using BTC to pay for apartment listings receive 60% discount to USD pricing! Travel Companies btcVacations, Full-Service travel agency booking hotels, resorts, flights, cruises, and rail - all in BTC. Simply Travel, 350.000 unique hotels worldwide. All bookable in BTC. Flights and Rental Cars following soon! Bitcoin.Travel, Travel for bitcoins! Bitcoin directory of hotels, restaurants, nightclubs, stores and other businesses in tourism industry, accepting Bitcoins around the world. BtcTrip Flights for bitcoins Hawaii Tours (info) Hawaii travel, tours, cruises, and adventures Hackers on a Plane offers complete travel packages to Hacker Conferences around the world, as well as special ala carte options to make attending conferences easier. Oasis Tenerife, San Eugenio Oasis Apartments in Tenerife. Nestled in the South of Tenerife next door to the Siam Park waterpark - come and have a browse around our website and come and see us in Tenerife. The Santa Cruz Experience - Airport and Event Shuttling Santa Cruz airport shuttle service. Bitcoin Homestay, private accomodation for BTC! Add your own (free) listing. Thailand Tours & Hotels, licensed agent based in southern Thailand will accept Bitcoin and book Thailand vacations on your behalf or even wiring money to Thai accounts if you wish. Bitcoin Cheddar Comprehensive bitcoin directory with tourism industry listings such as restaurants, tours, lodgings and more. Koryo Tours North Korea tours for the adventurous Turismo Nordico European travel agency (Latvia). Riding Holidays Freerein horse riding holidays in Wales UK. Sports tennis-termin.de (OSM) Book your Tenniscourt online and pay with Bitcoins. We are located at the south of Munich, Germany. The "Tenniscenter Wolfratshausen" has 6 outdoor clay courts and 3 indoor (carpet with granulate) courts. The Tennisland Geretsried has even 7 outdoor and 5 indoor courts! Also, we sell a selection of Tennis equipment. paraeasy.ch (OSM)We offer paragliding tandem flights in central Switzerland. Come and explore the third dimension with us. After the flight, you will understand why birds sing :-) Rojacherhütte (OSM) Small alpine hut at 2718m above sea level on the Sonnblick. Buy a beer and Käspressknödel with bitcoins. Austria, open July-October Tour guides Heidi Leyton Heidi Leyton - your guide in Berlin. Individual tours inside and outside of Berlin. Tours of Cracow and its Environs Tailor-made holidays in Poland, starting from Cracow. Friendly tourguides in Cracow, Wieliczka Salt Mines, Auschwitz Muzeum and many more. Tours available in most European languages. See Also Bitcoin Ladder Donation-accepting organizations and projects ECommerce Services Freelancers Bonus Programs Real world shops Existing business that have started accepting Bitcoin Businesses for promoting Bitcoins

FULL USER: MERKER ADDRESS: FLAW NOTES= pass + user= PATCH 3 days = 56hours + 101 % notes... + + + + + + + +984f5cb Status API Training Shop Blog About
